haha mate come work in the kitchen anytime although I might have to get some extra security that night good luck fella jamiex 
Support MOVEMBER charity with these bad boys caps go to #luckysevencaps #movember #ja MOVEMBER CAPS ARE GO  
I wouldn't be very impressed for sure 
Recipe of the day bro and sisters Quick lamb tagine pan-fried aubergine & cumin crunch RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
for sure, what time is it on? J x 
great job cinders 
I agree 
sounds great will tty 
thanks mate very kind of you cheers jox 
thanks so much for coming we all love that place come back soon jamie ox 
average price of my meals in 15 minute meals is £3.80 & a take away is more than often way more !! Knowing how 2 cook is the way 
thanks post office I have x4 letters going to Santa thanks for all you do 
Happy Monday guys its recipe of the day  its a delish seared tuna RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
Hi babe, Jools is looking forward to watching your show tomorrow night on ITV2 J x 
looks fantastic well done 
good job 
mix corn flakes and nice melted chocolate then chill nice to add sour dried fruit and bashed nuts old school we all love it jo 
there is both in both country's 
well done good luck jox x 
should be on  if not it will be up very soon jox 
looks tasty 
bless u jox 
I agree dumb asses I met the owner last year and she was loverly I bet she wouldn't approve of such drivel 
mate we all have different strengths were not all the same if she tries hard & finds a passion shell be sweet but yes work hard!!:) 
i can read i just struggle with narrative books but thats dyslexia I've written a few books if that makes up 4 it j 
yep I'm a sucker 
well done love j 
xxx 
breaded fish yes all over the country 
Wow look at the size of this spring onion 1.3 ft long!!!!!!
Mum just brought it aro THE DAY OF THE TRIFFID  
yeah may be not for you but normal people they'll be fine 
its not calorie count its just in check and full of the good stuff 
its perfectly normal it's simply proved its good to use in any way you like if you want to fully retard the bread freeze it 
Recipe of the day homeys  big love #jamie RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
glad you loved the food but we have2stay super busy or it doesn't work average spend per person is £17 so its amazing value jox 
thank u loads more to come 
What a busy week its officially a Happy 10th birthday Fifteen what a journey and wi Jamie Oliver's Fifteen  
cool leave you details with 15 restaurant j 
you can brush with oil but you do not need to may be its the power may be its not a great microwave mine was 40 quid at amazon 
“@Sy_Brighton: So excited to attend tonight with to celebrate 10 years! Huge achievement & may it continue!YES! 
Great to chat to you as well tigerx RT chatting to about his 15 minute meals!  
I love steve wright on hes such a nice man and a true pro 
yes it's looking. Amazing 
My Inspiration wall, show me your inspiration wall hash tag it #inspirationwall nice one inspiration wall  
The food truck has arrived at Gatwick airport all looking great and full of yummy things big lo food truck  
Recipe of the day Is  seared asian tuna, coconut rice & jiggy jigg RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
Happy birthday union jacks #jamie Union Jacks Holborn London  
December mate 
Work it !! work it !! work it !! eat your heart out Kate Moss, I got it going on ! Love look at my melons  
Aaahhhhh some one made us a union jacks 1st birthday cake so were having a par Union Jacks Holborn London  
15 minute meal book launch last night oh my head hurts now DJ BBQ was amazing my wife loves party  
Sexy people Recipe of the day hit this tag & retweet the love  big RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
i had a great time love one young world and I always look wrecked nothing changes there jox 
Cool run rise reflections with not so cool bed head have a fantastic day guys #jamie bed head  
I think you would like fish stew its great its right up your alley 
I can't believe you care on twitter who gives a sxxt 
me to big boy love the fat always most of the time but not in that dish it cooks to quick and the sinew is to hard jo 
thanks man I love that dish man truffles egg glad you enjoyed it 
I cant believe my 15 minute meals has gone to all these country's already in just 5 weeks 15 minute meals  
Recipe of the day loverly peeps!! Have a look  big love #jamie RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
Hi Recipe of the day !! lovely peeps!!  RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
Wow Sun rise in Essex is amazing today 6am hope you guys have a great week love #jamie sun rise  
congratulations a 15 minute meal pro well done what next ?? 
mate that is a compliment good man thanks for coming the new menu there makes me very happy enjoy jo 
 want me to cook it next 
bro i couldn't agree more mate love that place joxx 
just do it lee you'll love it everyone does meat balls so grow some 
well done youll get there next time thats an easy one jox 
the crab Bolognese its wicked 
im sure he'll buy you a drink and may be even a little dance especialy if you show him this nice one jamie ox 
no just over excited with me two mates 
well done jo  
no more time mate ill go the other way slow cooking!!:) jo 
hahah mate that cheese you make is off the chart cant get enough of it now hope your well mate the show looks great thanks j 
looks great all you need to do is pull your finger out nice picture have a great night jox x 
im sure you will sort them out jamie simply have a word and they will bend over backwards im sure enjoy your evening jox 
bless you all great job happy faces im a lucky boy have a great nights jox x 
heather you rock loving your plump buns!!!!:))) 
great job book should be wipe clean 
sorry really good 
reat job you even got the steam bro 
its in the british book babe jox x 
thanks for coming love being a customer there myself just have to wear a disguise jo 
good man good job 
i agree mate hes doing some cool stuff for food tube in january which will be new and exciting 
nice one bro all the best jamie music and food 
!!:) 
go to my web site there is hundreds and hundreds of recipes you can have  jox 
nice one natalie keep it up girl !!xxjo 
apple newsstand bro should be available most places I think jox 
well done bro jox. X 
Gannaro as a Turkey for Xmas Jamie magazine finally available in the Apple newsstand and ba Jamie Magazine  
just remove them 
respect 
I'm glad a pink dildo has brought us together welcome 
haha my proudest moment 
I can only apologise I don't know what happen 
santos is my brother from brazil 
otters not octopus 
what a shocker jox 
Not my finest moment I admit but very very funny alan Carr is a star great to be with jimmy D c pink dildo  
mate what can I say what a shock 
pleasure mate it was such fun 
its good bro its great 
great show Derren blooming great jamie ox 
at least I'm consistent !!:):) jox 
This Bad ass Cabbage its over 1 ft in hight & width never seen anything like it but I know ITS A BIG ONE  
try in our web site or simply call them up bro JO 
buffalo stance Nina cherry 
may be depends on timing bro send some details to 15 
pasta Norma is the bomb I love it 
happy birthday big love have a great day love jamie. X x d x x 
don't be crazy every country have them all of Europe and Asia adore mushrooms if anything Brits need to pick and eat more 
cheers man this was the first book I wrote with a nutritionist from a blank piece of paper that makes all T difference I learnt alot 
I'm blessed with an amazing team and great aussi produce and of-course super cool customers 
yep it pritty much ticks all the boxes big love jamie oxx 
pleasure good luck jamie ox 
notting hill and Clapham. Google Recipease of go to  for all the details jox 
pleasure mate it doesn't take any time for me and if it helps give people a few ideas that's a great anyway cheers nice one jamie ox 
Hi guys here's Today's 15 minute meal  for loads more recipes go t RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
yes you do and it lasts for ages good luck jo 
sorry run out of words! It's  go on and subscribe! X 
I'd love to see it ofcourse I would it always makes me happy 
always mail the web site enquiries babe 
don't think so mate 
yes why don't you do it and you see 
good luck mate take care 
10million thank yous for 10million views Join me & subscribe@ www.youtub my Food Tube channel You Tube  
I do I will normally twice a week joxxx 
Recipe of the day  RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
Barbecoa Anglo German smoked hot dogs made with amazing free range Tamworth pigs pear and Dog to Die for  
correct its fantastic technology it just depends what you freeze 
thank u babe joxx 
thanks man keep up the cooking what 15 minute next ? Glad you like them jamieo 
well done babe 
thank you which 15 minute meal next? 
brilliant thanks for following man jo 
Just did show with alan Carr so funny if you want to see me very compromised you have to watch the show on Friday 
are you in usa bro ??? Bless u 
yes babe Yeo valley had integration in a number of the shows jox 
there's not flour everywhere but we do make all pasta on sight most restaurants that cook fresh have flour 
Win one of 10.000 15 minute meals books easily!! u Gotta love Yeo Valley Organic win a 15 minute meal book  
check out what the lovely team from have in stall for you all for Christmas  
Love Brazil gooooooooal!!!
#jamie viva Brazil  
a bit of 15MM fun!  
Recipe of the day guys is amazing 15mins big love #jamie xxx  RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
great interview about 15MM with Romina from Metro World News 
weird take it back babe and swap it in shop or my restaurants never herd of that before where did u but it 
I cup two water always works for me put in a snug fitting pot with lid and use basmati ever time a winner oh and a pinch of salt 
yes we are next year 
I like platers shel and boards and big bowls 
because there are two recipes 
great job jox 
Union Jacks street party was super sweet loadsa locals new menu is bringing back memo Union Jacks Chiswick  
Listen up Chiswick! Me chris bianco & My ace team at Union Jacks Chiswick are throwing a real come see us  
big kiss from UK hope your well babe jox c 
good luck with it guys take care jamie 
no mate your fine 
pleasure bro glad you enjoyed it 
its a wicked recipe spring onions at the end are a must!!!!! Enjoy 
sorry about that when were u in and what floor and ill have a word 
have a great time jo 
Wowzers that is good value happy shopping 
me proud of you to top girl jox xx 
you need to learn the way sir one day you shall see the light jox 
Ok Bad picture but just made a fantastic roasted green salsa as shown to me by a Mexican l kick ass salsa  
thanks mate we do try hard and the Birmingham crew are great get them to buy you a beer on me 
love it babe and the ketchup in the background gold !!:) jox x x 
good man 
How funny is this I’m an Avatar! For the next two weeks I’ll be in Chefville for charity leadin Chefville  
great job 
great job 
because it looks amazing and is nice to eat off anyway serve it in what you like 
I'm sure your mayor has made the best decision for the city he's the most capable mayor in the world good luck with everything 
two of you cooking together that's the spirit well done 
mainly me lucy but a few peeps have access if its just pure info if it sounds like me it's me 
Bonjour peeps Recipe of the day a spicy number jerk pork medallions grilled cob & Tort RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
give her my love joxxx 
ginger candied in syrup u can get it everywhere in UK you can make your own peel simmer cool simmer again ginger chunks easy 
coming2vend of season now had the last of mine 3 days ago u might be able to get some from France but well replace dish jox 
xxthanks 
great love it 
Sorry I'm late its "Recipe of the day!!! " this is a cracker guys crispy skin Moroc Late Recipe of the day  
good luck in your efforts my friend all the best 
nice one bro what 15 minute meal next ? Jox 
good man 
Movember is here guys!!
As its the first of Movember & moustache season is here, help rai MOVEMBER is back  
Movember is here guys!!
As its the first of Movember & moustache season is here, help rai MOVEMBER is back  
We had a right laugh at Adventure island in Southend today with the kids Rage ro Adventure Island Southend  
Good luck to my team heading to NYC for the marathon! They trained so hard and money raised goes to  
it can work not always but it can 
fresh herbs etc you get the idea good luck if the meat comes away at the thickest point it's cooked 
ok nice remove guts cook & milky natural juices w come out mix that lemon juice olive oil 
bless you enjoy joxx 
great roasted I'm not sure what u have?a whole1fillet or tranche but oregano oil seasoning cherry toms 
The Oliver Family portrait 2012 Family portrait  
What an amazing young women is! Congrats on winning Pride of Britain Award last night darling. Lots of love JOx 
Morning guys Its another Recipe of the day from 15 minute meals have a look www.jamieo RECIPE OF THE DAY!!  
well done babe good job JO x. X 
A surprised designing our Union Jacks kids menu in 3D!!!!! Super cool can't wait to 3D menu  
hi guys Recipe of the day!! 15 minute meals Chinese steamed chicken, silky coconut bun recipe of the day  
well done Claire which one next ? Keep up the cooking jamie o 
ribs are ace steak I off the hook starters are fresh as a daisy wine list is mega and u must try the Bloody Mary its insane jox 
thanks mate glad you ha a great time at Jamie's italian come back soon jox 
you can pick them up cheaper than ever get it on your birthday list sister you want fat foods you need one 
Recipe of the day proper good !!  feel free to pass on to your buddy's love jamie ox 
Hi guys Recipe of the day curried lamb lolly pops rice and peas shaaaaaamon !!! Soooo g recipe of the day  
happy birthday babe jamie oxxxx 
bless him dragon sauce sounds wicked jox x x 
well done mate wish I could have done it myself looked great next time ill sign u up 
well done how cool the little one gobbled it up top man 15 minute meal down which one next? Jox 
Go Jools Go !!!! Half way point at the "Run To The Beat" Half marathon running for t Nike Run To The Beat  
ahhhh Jon I wouldn't blank u third time lucky in your dream 
happy birthday doughter !!! Jamie oxxx 
it looks good bro well done you can do it in 15 bro focus brother and you'll smash it good luck jox 
here u go  
happy birthday JO xx 
you'll over cook it 
 there great 
yeeeaaay well done babe is that your fist 15 minute meal ? Yeah chilli com meat balls is naughty and very nice 
great to see you man good luck in everything you do next time your in town lets have a cook up !!jox 
I just got April Bloomfields cook book :):) it fantastic and she's the best cook!! I just l Great Cookbook  
Recipe of the day a delicious mushroom farfalle with a kick ass salad rolling in at jus recipe of the day  
u miss herd the standards for dog food is more strict than academy schools as Mr Gove has removed the standards that's not good 
babe your tweet doesn't really make sense but email through my web site and well try and feed back to you jox 
good lad your fast man I only did it on tv tonight you must have run down the shop and smashed it ! :) well impressed jo 
yeah I love them jox x x 
thanks for coming I love that place bet place for a wedding it's closed at the weekends waste!!:) 
no excuse ill be on it asap 
glad u enjoyed it jox x 
its per person and no that is really good for any dinner ( thats the same cals as one blue berry muffin) jox 
#jamies15MM serving up Beef stroganoff and also cooking up some Moroccan mussels, 5pm today on C4  Jx 
guys few of you asking about the time that 15 Minute Meals is on, you can always catch it on if you miss it at 5pm  
cold + rain = roast dinner this weekend! My mum's roast chicken is my ONE food, check out my other ONE THINGS on  #ad 
Recipe of the day guys from todays 15 minute meal  recipe of the day  
here you go  
My Xmas is out! How to carve, my best Xmas veg, fish by & amazing cakes by Dean nice one Jx 
looks good bro well done love the family service in the middle 
hahah good man it work a treat 
bless your hart happy xmas 
hahah he's a clever boy and very right I wish I didn't have to talk but I'm not sure if I have a job !!:):) big kiss jox 
Recipe of day a little late from tonight fifteen minute meals enjoy guys #jamie x  recipe of the day  
dude you are a dude great looking dish man respect !!jox 
its a vintage pot babe look on eBay 
well done bro 
the average price of a 15 minute meal in the book is less than 4quid per person you do more than that on a couple pints haha jox 
love the bag bro fantastic thank u again see u next time I'm in town jamie 
good job sister well done love those comfort food and quick 
good lad !!great 15 minute meal job keep it up man jam 
a regular roasting tray babe metal for sure 
Yes! RT Watch our #foodrevhangout on how we can shape a better future, LIVE 4pmGMT on  … … … 
well done matey 
I'm the voice over font scare me 
saffron and ginger are all over the place in decent supermarkets have a look there there bro 
well done sister which 15 minute meal next 
fish stew is sooooo go style it babe jox 
#jamies15mm being served up in 15 minutes, 5pm Channel 4, recipes here for you all  
If you believe in the #FoodRevolution, check out #FoodDay, all about quality fresh ingredients & getting back to basics! 
Very funny, i was walking along the road in our local town and my two little kids go crazy a kids gone mad  
gla you enjoy the magazine the Xmas issue is a good done did you see Gannaro on the front funny 
lucked out big time 
How funny is that, I got my own sign in Dublin !:) thanks to all the team there doi Jamie's italian Dublin  
well done classic smile dish jox x x 
how did you do that dish so fast you are a ninja 
thanks so much there are some crackers jox xx 
good girls classic tune 
thanks man 
Hope u enjoyed 15minute meals I'm dead proud & hope u loved the Neneh Cherry buffalo stance remix we did especially for the show I love it!! 
you are very loyal thank u 
ah you must have the book already your fast !!!:) 
glad u liked it :):) proud jox 
thank you it's on every day for 8 weeks !!!! 
cholula bro its everywhere 
thanks so much I'm really pleased with it thanks jox 
glad u like it babe it's the right time of year for it jox 
#jamies15MM recipes from today's show here guys,  let me know what you think, glad you enjoyed the first episode 
thanks for all your nice comments on #jamies15mm guys! glad you like the recipes J x 
loadsa veggie options jox 
Fifteen minute meals starts today in UK guys 5pm channel 4 hope you love it as much a Fifteen minute meals  
From left to right the chef the pork farmer me and the maple syrup dude feeling tire Sugar Shack Montreal  
Me & martin picard chef of sugar shack and au pied de cochon.....a super nice guy & Sugar Shack Montreal  
Me and Baby cows in the country #jamie Montreal  
If you know good food and you live in Montreal then you know what this sign means !!!!! Oh my lo Montreal  
well done doctor Ellie hope your well big kiss jox 
Check out this Canadian Plummer in Montreal how friggin funny is this guy !!! :):)):: #jamie Montreal  
4 chefs hanging out early in the am just before todays service. Loving Montreal man big love #ja Montreal  
Maison Publique gets a visit from my bro George Stroumboulopoulos & the 4720 Marquette & Gilford Montreal  
Roasted tuna cheek cooked blushing seasoned oil and butter so so so so g 4720 Marquette & Gilford Montreal  
A line court tuna cheek !! I've never seen one to be honest amazing jus 4720 Marquette & Gilford Montreal  
Maison Publique is now very much open congratulations to my Canadian bro 4720 Marquette & Gilford Montreal  
This has to be Good luck I recon !!!! Smiling #jamie Montreal  
I'm so happy this is the best Rainbow I've ever seen !!!! Nature is best #jamie rainbow  
Thank you to the amazing group of inspiring experts that kindly agreed to be on my panel a ONE YOUNG WORLD  
My two new very sweet friends super cooks of the future .......judged a kids cooking cha big kids cook off  
Just been to Trump hotel in Toronto and the restaurant called Stock had a chocolate labora Bye Bye Toronto  
Wow Busy day, just finished thanks to all the people that came to the book signing and tv sho hallo Canada  
Car got smashed in the wall Just did the Marilyn Denis show ....sweet sweet people and very s hallo Canada  
bless you babe it was a pleasure you guys are always a great audience big love joxxx 
so sorry I only just got your tweet would have love to have met you big love jamie ox x x 
bless your hart great to see u sister take care jamie xox 
Brilliant idea buddy! Let me know how it goes ;) JO 
so glad you have enjoyed cooking fresh babe jox 
defo not me bro 
Very funny I mentioned to a journalist that we were having thousand of napkins stollen every Napkin theif  
What an incredible few days in #Pittsburgh for U guys are amazing! Thank you for having me & for continuing the JOx 
Just over an hour till I hit the stage with some brilliant people! Watch it live  #foodrevolution #OYW 
So Excited to talk about #foodrevolution w some AMAZING food revolutionaries LIVE at 10.30am ET #OYW #Pittsburgh  
Met so many incredible people today! Who is coming to see me in Toronto tomorrow night? Get down to Massey Hall!  
Loving Pittsburgh. Check this out in UK we have boring old police bikes out here they all ONE YOUNG WORLD  
see you there 
important research...........conclusion.... Pittsburg has some very nice beer. Great people and a loverly fa  
ONE YOUNG WORLD starts again this time in Pittsburgh !!! Can't wait to tell you all about ONE YOUNG WORLD  
see you there jamie xx 
On my way to find out how the city of #Pittsburgh is going to embrace the !! 
High five Pittsburgh - looking forward to ONE YOUNG WORLD always a humbling and inspiring I you don't know w  
Looking forward to being in Toronto once again, love that city! see you all at Massey Hall this Friday  J x 
your welcome glad you enjoyed Jamie's italian come see us for Xmas party's it's gonna be fantastic JO 
ill look in to that bro thanks jo 
doesn't really matter what u cook it in as long as it has some depth of eggs and lower temp so it slowly curdles & scrambled 
Recipe of the day guys big love #jamie  recipe of the day  
The Sun going down on Southend pier taken by my buddy who shoot all my cook food fight club  
I thought it was very close my lord he was so sweet 
glad you like your 15 minute meal dim sum what next ? 
haha well done your first 15 minute meal complete I throw a kiss down the twitter line :)xxx on to the next jamie x 
Well done John from the great British bake off well deserve mate good luck in all you do I recon he has the potential to go super sonic jox 
I recon John will win 
see you there come say hi joxx 
think there all great to be honest but love that old fella he's so sweet I just wanna hug him 
I have to say me jools and all the kids just love the great British Bake off a proper quality family cooking show good luck all jamie ox x 
Support MOVEMBER buy styling one of these super super cool bespoke CAPS from MOVEMBER CAPS ARE GO  
During November each year, Movember is responsible for the sprouting of moustaches on th MOVEMBER is back  
MOVEMBER is back guys grow that tash to support an amazing men's cancer charity!! tash MOVEMBER is back  
pleasure guys so nice to meet you keep up the inspiring work take care jamie ox x x 
sorry Alex not sure if its me or damn auto correct ?!:):(: 
Love the One Show Guys thanks Matt and Anne and as for young Martha Payne The nine-year-old One show BBC  
smoked chicken scallops smoked salt as it is is still special 
Morning guys its recipe of the day retweet damn tasty grilled marinated mozzarella with c   
haha you've discovered union jacks pizza !!! So good best dough wood fired I just love then myself big love Jumx x x 
Last Raspberries of the year ....yum....until next year you little suckers!!! Until then I have an garden  
Imagine if this Guys dream could come true !?!?!?! check out this video guys this is super coo Great idea  
start a revolution babe thats the only way build a group of like minded people and do it check out  
one of My favourite recipes in the world I've done ribs tonight :) jox x x 
hi holly we will replace your grater if u send it in contact  mines rock solo Si I'm sure it's a one off jox 
classic combo gotta love it have a good one there is loads-a free recipes on  check it out jox 
sad to say that's the way mate it makes me so sad one day well lock it down & get people looked after better hopefully 1 day JO 
ha u got 15 minute meals cool make sure u read the intro sister u'll love it and the book will take care of you big love #jamie xx 
bro i wish I could school food still needs help bro its a crime of our times need to look after our kids jox c x 
enjoy Recipease is there to help bro 
I might be down there depends on the kids but I use to be a member o the YMCA good times JO 
bro I didn't know what to expect 
great idea start at the sink and you will work up bet way to do it that's how I did it good people always do well big love jamie 
mate we all love a curry bro those Indians are so clever !! 
give what up 
love master chef Australia it's a great show big love jamie ox 
how amazing is the Cheltenham restaurant site tenfold court rooms make sure you behave the jail is still there jox xx 
come see u at Recipease for cooking lessons well sort u out goo luck JO x 
A beautiful day outside my restaurant Barbecoa reflections are of the hook love #jamie Barbecoa  
has just been shooting our artisan dogs and pulled pork in our push cart #jamie  
You wanna fight ......lets fight!!! Ninja days food fight club  
You wanna fight ......lets fight!!! Ninja days food fight club  
so nice to meat you babe thanks for your support tonight at the big love jamie xx 
Recipe of the day marmalade roasted ham so goooood!!! yum  recipe of the day  
glad you enjoyed union jacks the new menu there is going down a treat come back any time jox 
Thank you Belgium wow what a great two days of hard work, good food, great people a Thank you Belgium!!:)  
Recipe of the day a little baking to make you smile !!:) big love #jamie www.jamieol recipe of the day  
It's the final countdown!  #bigchairproject 
don't forget to bid on this cool Hipstamatic ANT chair created by me and my close buddy David Loftus  #BigChairProject 
Welcome to Belgium !! Lucky Jools!! food fight club  
guys, only a few HOURS till The Big Chair Project online auction closes, not too late to place a bid on my EGG chair  Jx 
to my US lot #ChefRace continues tonight on the chefs head out into the outback for some foraging fun  
Nice one, thank you Jx RT This is what wrote for you..!! The BIG chair project.!  
bless Rhys my favourite creative clever people are dyslexic if anyone gives him trouble send them to me and I'll sort them out 
haha that's a good one that empire chicken good on ya 
yep you'll defo need 15 min meals with kids running around good luck with little one jox 
glad you enjoyed the 15 minute meal bro not sure where that one came from but it's good JO 
well done for completing your first 15 minute meal mate what next ??? Jamie ox 
after a long road Maison Publique finally opens in Montreal this Wednesday so exciting, soft runs have gone v well good luck Derrick & team 
Hi guys It's the last day that you can make a bid on one of our Fritz Hansen c   
special Fifteen 10th anniversary dinner next week grads come back to cook  spaces free, please come Jx 
Congrats 2 Derrick & all the Maison Publique team in Montreal,soft launches have been going really well, opening Wednesday can't wait!JamieO 
Silverstone Formula one race track through the clouds cool off up north  
it our 3rd best selling pasta dish even the kids love it , we should eat more of it 
really excited that so many of you are liking Chef Race on great series for me to work on as Exec Producer  
Friends this is the spot where I was conceived, at the end of Southend pier in Essex ( the southend pier  
Recipease Food Store Notting Hill- looks amazing today and thanks for great breakf Recipease Notting Hill  
Ohhhh my lord yes I'm biased but the compition for the best house burger is always Union Jacks Chiswick  
To my US lot, catch episodes 1 and 2 of Chef Race tonight on - great new series from my gang  
you'll be just fine do what it says and pull your finger out and you'll be laughing I've had teenagers doing them under time 
thanks man hope your well dude hook up soon I say big love Jumx 
So here they are guys the 12 young chef graduates from my FIFTEEN restaurant training FIFTEEN Graduation  
Ahhhhh so proud 10 years of FIFTEEN restaurant and tonight we graduate 12 fantastic the Fifteen students  
your pics in the advertising for #jamies15MM check it out, get cooking the recipes and upload   
haha glad you like the book yes that's a nice one take care jamie 
great job I love the show big live jamie 
Sadly we can't offer boiling water for baby food , wish we could but we simply can't so sorry jox 
Yaaaay my home grown Hops are ready !! Time to make some beer !! And the shoots were deli cropping Hops  
nick and cat have a gret life together good luck it's the best big love jamie xxx 
thanks for getting the book hope you really enjoy it read the intro to get in the 15 minute meal mind set !! Bless 
To my US lot catch #chefrace tomorrow night on 10pm US vs UK chefs battling it out as they cross America nice one 
Nice one tiger Don't forget to upload your pics here  they may end up in our ad campaign for #jamies15MM 
thank you, had such fun! Podcast here for anyone who missed it  J x 
Thanks tiger couple of #jamies15MM recipes here to try  take some pics for me 
So nice to see zoe on big love #jamie  
Morning guys just about to go on & see the loverly Zoe Ball love that girl gonna cook her some breakie Mexican stylie!!:) jamiex 
ahhhhh bless you 
no babe ill never do time again 15 mins is enough hope you like it I think it's best one yet let me know how you get on 
have a drink on me show your waiter bless u jamie x 
thanks babe gla u likes the new book I worked real hard on it what you gonna cook first ?? Jamie x 
Mount Vesuvius shot in crazy taxi not bad for i phone shot 60mph but the truth is I CRAZY TAXI DRIVER  
catch me on chatting about my new book #jamies15MM with the lovely and cheeky chappy Friday at 8am Jx 
It's here! my new book #jamies15MM is out cook the recipes and share them  also check out my video  
Me and Don Gannaro in the Amalfi Coast ....gret day so far, now for some serious Cake baking Amalfi Coast  
My are having a live GLOBAL hangout tomorrow at 9am PT/5pm GMT!  tune in folks! J x  
nice #jamies15MM pics being posted up  mobile  beef or fritters? beef or fritters? keep them coming 
Happy Birthday to my Mummy 61 and still a top Girl !!! Best mum in the world !!!!:):): happy birthday mum  
love being back in Italy! so much going on #jamies15MM out tomorrow, recipes here to try  mobile  
Big day today filming in italy with The To Dons !! my chef mentor and italia  
At Jamie's Italian in Gatwick Airport wow weather is amazing food here is spot on Jamies Italian Gatwick  
Thinking about dinner? #jamies15MM  
That's easy bro try seared asian beef best noodle salad and ginger dressing from my new book #jamies15MM  
loving the #jamies15MM recipes that you are posting up guys, keep them coming!  mobile  
#jamies15MM recipes here  and on mobile  try them tonight! J x  
don't forget to hash tag your pics guys with #jamies15MM excited to see what you are cooking, seared asian beef or ricotta fritters? 
thinking of dinner? #jamies15MM  grab the ingredients on way home, cook it and share it mobile here  
try now tiger, ok let me know  #jamies15MM 
I'm doing a demo in the basement in about half hour. X 
on my way to at Oxford Street now to check out the pop up restaurant, come along and say hi J x 
check out my video on #jamies15MM  if you are on a mobile device here are the recipes for you  
Morning guys #recipe of the day guys a simple rustic beef carpaccio with dressed beans recipe of the day  
Finally i can sit down & watch "Jimmy and the whale whisperer" on ch4 roast dinner ready :) hope your all Having a good one jamie oxxx 
Ricotta Fritters or Seared Asian Beef? Which recipe will you make for #Jamies15MM? don't forget to hash tag the pics J x 
Thnks for the great comments on my new book tweet me your Instagram cooking shots with hash tag #Jamies15MM can't wait to see the results Jx 
here you go bro, my recipes for some lovely home made curry pastes  
we have lovely forum members from all over the world ready to help you with #jamies15MM cooking questions, ask away!  
glad to hear you are all excited about my new book, you can read more about my thoughts on the book here  #jamies15MM 
Guys, you can view the #Jamies15MM recipes in the album on Facebook if you are looking at it on your phone  
yes bro, comes out later in the year, keep checking my website for details 
Jamie's (that would be me) 15 Minute Meals, try a couple of the recipes now if you like #Jamies15MM 
Guys my new book is out this week, cook one of my recipes, Instagram & hashtag it #Jamies15MM so excited!  J x 
"Top of the morning to yaa" Guinness & Parmesan can only mean one thing!?!? Jamie's Italia Dublin is open  
Not in public guys Oops #jamiesrudeveg #jamie #jamierudeveg  
Oh no I have a problem !!!!! I've been cocking today Haha.. a very excited tomato !! :):):) come on guys le  
Look what I just cropped and im a gonna COOK !!! Yeah man who loves the squash !! squash time  
Recipe of the day steak 2 kick ass sauces !! Yum yum on  love #jami recipe of the day  
looking for a talented Irish graffiti artist for a 7 by 5 meter wall the real deal no pretty boys to be done ASAP in Dundrum Dublin help xx 
Morning guys can you help I wanna find a talented local Irish graffiti artist for my new restaurant can anyone help out there ? Send me link 
try hitting it with some Thai flavours, here is a recipe for you, let me know how you get on  
The best bloody Mary ever at Barbecoa going on the new list !! Pickles 7 hour smoked c bloody mary heven  
nothing like good old apple crumble bro  
Recipe of the day a wicked mushroom soup with mushroom crostini double Pleasure !!!! Rec   
We're hosting the British Street Food Awards today & tomorrow, what a fantast British Street Food Awards  
Whoop woop Freshly picked sweet peppers are finally ready to eat!! Hope you guys what u cooking  
Watching the tv tonight I thought the Audience was brilliant clever touching & fresh congratulations to all The team Garden Productions jx 
mutton isn't goat or lamb bro . lamb is a 1 years old sheep Hoggit is 2 years old and mutton 3 year old sheep it's very good Jo 
Some great news just in guys, NYC Board just approved soda ban, congratulations  
My buddy Jonny is cycling the 270 miles between Fifteen Cornwall an   
#fifteenstreet for the best of British Street Food, outside this weekend, don't miss this one J x  
Will the Education secretary Mr Gove listen to Parent Team GB ??? Here are the over n lets do it parents  
Ahhhhhh how it was to be blond !!! My nick name was bang bang I used to wait outside the fron Baby jamie  
Bit late today for Recipe of the day pan-seared venison with blueberries, shallots and recipe of the day  
Big week at 15, 7th group of grads cooking tomorrow night (11th) to celebrate 10th anniversary, info here  
Carousel view from the River Cafe 25 year anniversary tonight, thank you rose we all 25 years River Cafe  
"Check out w amazing traders, street food & music in Newcastle 27th/ 28th/29th Sept 6pm onwards  " 
better than butter or marge 
haha a secret we import them our self very south is all I can say :) 
Beautiful day here in uk hope you all have a great one jamie x 
My Favourite new gadget!! Brilliant 360 video & stills the videos are off the hook w   
Now this makes me happy guys!! Cold beer....so heres the scoop for my italian restaurants instead of importi  
#fifteenstreet you all loved the last street party so we are having another one with #bsfa  don't miss Jx 
try spicing it up i reckon  
#cookingquestions got any for me? log onto the forums on my site and ask away  nice one J x 
Hi Sarah, simple guacomole recipe for you  and perfect roast spuds as well  
#cookingtips ever wondered how to BBQ veg so that it's not all mushy and oh so good? then check out my latest video  J x 
Ohhhh no Not good ......fire #jamie fire  
Thank you to everyone that supported and worked on The Big Feastival !!!! It was great thank u Thank you  
nice one bro! Loved 
here you go tiger  
Me & Gannaro demonstrating at Feastival great fun !!  
Big feastival kicks off!!! What a day so far big love jamie Big Feastival  
I spell it my way cheers anyway 
i have to say me & my family find the #parolymics so so truly inspiring . Humbled, happy, entertained & in owe!! Love and respect to all jox 
Off to The Big Feastival now it's gonna be a rocking weekend in Oxford at Alex James kicking off tonight  
i luv my fennel with pork loin, here is a recipe from my site tiger  
happy birthday joan big kiss jamie 
happy birthday hope you get some cool stuff u coming to feastival babe 
see you there babe can't wait 
You rock babe RT Hey cannot wait to see you all this weekend ! let's eat ourselves in to oblivion! 
Well done & all the amazing participants on the #foodrevhangout The video is LIVE!!!! on G+ & YouTube  
see u there babe 
The Big Feastival is this weekend weather looking great great music & food come see me & and loadsa fantastic chef demos jox 
Watch my in their first community #foodrevolution google+ hangout!! In one hour live on  #foodrevhangout 
I love this moody photo, I don't think I've ever shown you guys my butchers shop a amazing butchers shop  
Listen up guys! RT 1 day until our #foodrevhangout, tomorrow 10am PT/1pm ET!! Check it out:  … #foodrevolution 
Me cooking a bunch of corn dishes on the roof tops of London it is poring with rain but I'm hap #jamieveg  
Here are some great shots of yours that i love !! The spirit is fab so As i said before guys I #jamieveg  
thank you to ambassador, the lovely for mentoring grad great initiative, well done J x 
any grown up solutions always welcome good luck with your efforts 
Recipe of the day a super fast summer tomato spagetti so good sauce is dine in two min recipe of the day  
I've never told staff to say any of that Ron bless the papers they come out with some crackers jo:)x 
it's a cracker mate always a winner and the welsh gang do a great job rocking it out 
ahhhhh you are funny you'll see the light one day ...just make sure your not playing catch up 
haha true that's what happens in essex I just bought his three wheeler so I must have permission to be a bit del boy now 
ahhhhh bless u hope you had a good one xxxx:) 
can't wait lets have it 
the recipe in my British book is amaz-balls very good and simply add in mango to the recipe would be so good 
I wouldn't be happy at all I'd sort you out a real meal !!:) 
I'm pleased for you make sure it's Nicely dressed orbit will taste boring big kiss jox 
ditto back to you sister awesome !sick ! Rad! 
thanks super dry you are the best love your chair thanks so much big love to you and team jamie ox x x 
bless u have a great day 
Mornings a really easy cute crumbly lemon biscuits gret for a bank holiday if your i cute lemony biscuits  
So one week before we hit up the second year of the Big Feastival, two days of g great food & great music  
pleasure mate well done, still work in progress & it's harder now with the new government but well keep going good luck to u Jo:) 
great line up for Chef's Week including thnks to all of the chef's cooking you guys rock!  
Nice to hear J x 
congrats good luck and have a happy life together jamie oxx 
glad you had a great time man big live jamie ox 
it's on  I checked the link go direct bro jox 
happy birthday big love jamie ox x x 
what a great pic bless yep I was upstairs shame may be next time big love Jo x x 
funny you should say that we've got some crackers coming big love joxxx:) 
Thanks to team at Cambridge great lunch even I get to eat in my restaurants some times!! Saying that my kids  
Recipe of the weekend ! An Oliver family classic :)  Roasted pulled pork  
cure is great mate old school mixed up album is great 
I've never done it before, I'd give it a go and you may have to add more or less flour but have a base and use you instinct jox x 
good luck guys have a great day big love jamie 
Hi guys recipe of he day a really good brunch for the weekend love #jamie xx  recipe of the day  
Hi guys recipe of he day a really good brunch for the weekend love #jamie xx  recipe of the day  
good luck Idris RT Tonight at 10pm on #C4 - 'How Clubbing Changed the World' presented by the amazing Don't miss! 
Morning guys the Big is next weekend , I'll be doing demos every day and out and Feastival next weekend  
thanks the team there are fantastic come again soon jox 
have a great time it's looking good there jox x :) 
A Pic of Me & Petal through a window with a reflection of me shooting me & Petal Me, Petal & Maaaarleeen  
Look at this i really Love Quentin Blake's chair !! But also the amazing Sarah   
Just love chair . Well done buddy cant wait to sit on it !!! 'The   
Homewood bound in cab looking forward to seeing the kids after nice short break in Spain big love jamiex  
Ribs are on !!! Get ready for Next weekend it's the  camping this y Big Feastival  
Hi guys come see me Im hosting The 2nd Big Feastival at Alex James' lovely farm in ox come to my festival  
Ok guys the Recipe today is a very light refreshing dessert lemon & lime so Lemon& Lime peppermint sorbet  
how about my squash laksa soup????  
The Oliver family are very proud to announce the arrival of its latest member to the family. We've named her  
'The BIG Chair Project is now live at  Check it out and get bidding in the live a  
Recipe of the day grilled squid, chilli mint salsa yum !! perfect for now grilled squid chilli mint salsa  
So for the recent haters of my beautiful rustic Birkenstock Sandals I've now bought a new new flip flops  
Hi guys 50 reasons to support #VirginTrains  Please sign e-petition urging Government to reconsider  
Really proud of my wife Jools, she excitedly launched "Little Bird" in Mothercare this week. She loved calib  
to get everyone bidding would be great  thank you #bigchairproject J 
need your help guys RT #bigchairproject and show your support! thankyou and Big Love to the stars who designed the chairs Jx 
LOVE it! RT How decadent is Sarah Burton's chair for  #bigchairproject 
Ok ive never done this before but if your a food geek like me I may put a regular pic and info up of cool fa  
Hi guys hope your cool, I just put this recipe of the da Herb & goats cheese salad magic grilled chillis  
Oh and here's my one ....of course ignore the bucket!! the legs will go back one :) its Got 4 seasons of fr  
Heres a Burberry chair and remember five chairs will be put into a raffle so anyone can afford to bid for a  
Hi guys to celebrate 10 years my Fifteen restaurant charity I have 20 amazing artists to design there very o  
thankyou John 15 is going strong thanks to hard work from good people we've trained some great Chefs hard to believe we are 10 
great events to celebrate 10th anniversary of 15 don't forget Chefs Week awesome line up including Fergus Henderson  
Come on man!!! Fish over fire this is the way !! Hot day very happy with my mrs joxx:)  
catch the last episode tonight of the brilliant series Simply Italian C4, 8.30pm well done to the lovely Chiappas J x  
A it's a hot hot day I thought I'd put a load of BBQ recipes up,  then hit the BBQ button hav  
lovely day for a #BBQ , all of my favourite recipes for you here  nice one J x 
great on Johnathan ross lots of love jamie ox:) 
funny tweet good luck getting home Jo:) 
Well he's the winner of x factor we might as well do the final next week what an amazing talent who ever you are bless u joxx 
come on amyamac there berkys any respectable hippy has a pair & wears them with pride & there comfy I must be getting old I recon 
good idea something in that vein I recon a well Jo:) 
hope to be there mate 
Got my crop of tomatoes !! Whoop whoop grew a whole load of different ones as per norm also Egg plants/ aube  
thanks to all the amazing consultants that made the awards today in Birmingham you guys R amazing respect as ever love jamiex 
Can't believe I'm nearly at 600.000 followers that's amazing !! you guys have been amazing and your photos a  
so proud x #LittleBird range by is finally here! What will you get for your little ones? 
Come on man !! Apple pie cowboy style !!! Recipe of the day guys as the apples are just recipe of the day  
answer on my forums for you bro  #cookingquestions 
hello, hello answer for you on my forums all from experience cooking for my family  hope this helps J 
a common question and a good one! My answer here for you on the forums  J #cookingquestions 
Good question tiger, have posted the answer up on my forums for you  let me know how you get on J 
here you go, let me know how you get on  #cookingquestions 
answer was a bit long for Twitter so I posted it up on my forums for you, cheers J  
nice pic! glad you like the new store in Notting Hill 
well done guys, so proud RT@Recipease And we are OPEN!!! If you're in Notting Hill, come in and say hello...it's buzzing at the moment xx 
nice one RT@supermsarah oving 'Recipease'! launches today -Notthinghill -Recipease super workshop/restaurant/cafe/shop concept! 
Today I'm cooking 25 new dishes look at all my plates super cool - just about to kick off a barn in Essex  
Cohort 10 of The Fifteen students just a few months to go before graduation keep you the Fifteen students  
Come on instagramers your creative and artistic which cover left or right ? I lo you secide right or left  
Yay my little daisy just made her first loaf 100% on her own !!! And it tasted good win kids and cooking  
here is my basic risotto recipe with tips, hope it helps tiger  
love mint in potato salad, here is one of my recipes for your Mum  
the-ultimate-fruit-salad- A load of new recipes up on my web site today www.jamieoliv recipe of the day  
A fishy tale from me - my top tips on buying fish!  J x 
Glad to hear, nice one 
Nice one, looking good bro! check out my video on pasta cooking tips  
don't forget people, please tune in tonight 8.30 on Channel 4 to watch the lovely thank you thank you J x 
#cookingquestions got any cooking questions for me? Log onto the forums on my site and ask, just answered a load now  
hi there, You want to use a hard cheese, such as manchego J 
here you go, easy  
ok tiger, how about this for the #recipeoftheday it's one of my favs, enjoy!  
so excited about the new store opening in Notting Hill this week, good food, cooking classes and more!  J x 
Don't miss this one is hosting the 2012 British Street Food Awards 15th and 16th Sept  Nice one Jx 
Want some tips on cooking delicious Italian food? ask the lovely I reckon they could even teach me a thing or 2 #simplyitalian 
pleasure tiger! nice to see authentic and quality Italian cooking on tele, loving the show J x 
please follow the lovely they are cooking up delicious food on Simply Italian Monday C4 at 8.30 made by Jx 
Me the muppets and don johnson from Miami vice at the today show London 2012  
Me my food team girls and the loverly Dame Helen Mirren ( looking amazing as or norm) at Olympic stadium  
Me and Ben Fogle at the Today show ...a man my wife loves this guys done some amazing ad Olympic stadium  
Guys check out my last live cooking slot on at 9am EST. I have something cracking for you! 
#recipeoftheday one of my favourite risotto dishes for you all, grilled mushroom risotto  enjoy J x 
done 
#recipeoftheday lunchtime here in the UK, whose up for some lovely farro salad with roasted veg?  Jx 
So lovely to meet you darling. As I said you did everyone so proud! Dinner on me soon! Big Love JOx 
Back down at the Olympic Park for some more live cooking on the . Who's tuning in? JOx 
#recipeoftheday video recipe for you today, good ol meatballs and pasta  enjoy! Jx 
catch my good mate Jimmy Doherty's show Jimmys Forest tonight, 9pm on More4 clever boy that one!  Jx 
check it out, i'm online now, live streaming from the London Media Centre  
#recipeoftheday loverly taglierini with a simple sweet tomato sauce and shrimps  enjoy! J x 
A great memorable experience with the family , really easy to get to and really well org Olympic stadium  
Bolt away final soon what a night !!! Amazing London 2012  
Amazing!! At London 2012 can't wait 100 meter final !!! Very slick getting in never see Olympic stadium  
Well done Jessica Ennis well love you !! Amazing !! Gold  
#recipeoftheday a rather lovely barbecued red mullet with a hot salsa  enjoy Jx 
“@Sy_Brighton: So great bumping into today with  Good seeing you buddy! 
The sun is out! Pimms anyone?! Tune in to the soon for my recipe really soon! 
Make sure you tune in to today! Some British classics coming your way live from the Olympic park! 
Heading back to the olympic park again today! Can't wait to feel the buzz after some great wins! Congrats to everyone 
WOW! celebrates with famous guest chefs, a great line up, more info and booking details here  
Want me to answer your food & cooking queries in my ? Ask now, include #askJamieO & we'll print the best! 
Me shooting shooting top twenty British cheese in my smoker telephone box another norm cool  
awesome unsigned band competition! chance to play on stage along with Paloma Faith Razorlight and more  
Didn't our girls do well on the Just shows what good food education can do for our kids.  
Get ready guys! Live on the really soon with my helpers!  
Tune into at 8-9am EST to see me cooking up some wicked food with two amazing children from my in Suffolk! 
Heading over to the Olympic park later to cook live on the with two very special little guests!  
#recipeoftheday lovely chicken and mushroom bake for you  enjoy! J x 
Thank you Mary berry good work!! ://www.telegraph.co.uk/foodanddrink/9432867/Teach-cooking-in-schools-says-Queen-of-Cakes-Mary-Berry.html 
Look who I found in my veg patch !!! Sooo cute two of them hanging around the salad My two baby hedgehogs  
Dear Instagramers so far in the last 16 months you have proven your steal as th Raise a million in hours  
“@Sy_Brighton: Thank you for having me and today looking forward to next Tuesdays show" Me Too! Jox 
“@Sy_Brighton: Olympia! With and the apprentices ready for the  you were awesome 
Look who I bumped in to at the Only my buddy  
USA friends! Make sure you tune into the from 8am to see me cooking with my apprentices! 
Looking forward to seeing you soon guys! 
Two important things guys firstly look what Mr Oliver just converted into a hot and cold read below guys  
Nominations now open for all of those brilliant dinner ladies and cooks out there, BBC Food & Farming Awards  
ood man did you go gas or charcoal enjoy them man there good 
pleasure what a great team you are its the most wonderful restaurant i think Norwich will love it heres to you guys jox x x 
Just downloaded Wild Bill on iTunes, it just came out... A brilliant INDI film wort baby face made a film  
Watergate Bay, great views and great food!  
oh so sorry to hear that, plenty of recipes on my site for you  
Morning, morning, to celebrate the arrival of the sun here in the UK here is a selection of my favourite BBQ recipes  Jx 
Agretti is ready ( some call it monks beard) one of the easiest things to grown cut and i deep deep Essex  
The interview made me laugh out load, Derek will smash it for sure he's a great cook..p.s love  
Loving the recipe of the day today - slow roasted spiced pork loin with black eyed beans and tomatoes  Enjoy! J x 
nice one! check out my How To video on how to chop an onion  J x 
Looking good tiger! 
big love to everyone who worked so hard on the series and respect to the team for continuing the work J x 
cooking with herbs, cooking with herbs, it's all about cooking with herbs!  
Join me in the #MandelaDayPledge book RT join millions building a global movement for good at  
Me & my loverly jools HIT FIFTEEN Cornwall what a treat and a joy the food and service was Watergate bay  
#recipeoftheday keeping with the summer theme today it is Simple Summer Pasta  enjoy J x 
bring back Summer I say! Jamie's Summer Food Rave up tonight on C4 at 8.30  Jx 
Like mamma Like daughters three peas in a pod my girls  
Bless Rick Stein a tibble I love is Chalky's Bite amazing fresh light beer (with v subtle h Chalky's Bite  
Is it a bird ....is it a phone ..... No its a bottle opener phone cover !!!!! Essenti phone bottle opener  
thanks for the tweet Ivanka hope your well jamie ox 
thank you tiger, glad you enjoyed it J x 
Thanks to from Amazing dj from the street party. On radio 1 now until 10. Give her a listen. JO xxx 
Britain will not have a Dairy industry if this Goes on much longer FACT !! Dairy Industry needs your help  
my tips for you on cooking pasta  have a good one! J x 
Crazy, bonkers, mad, brilliant and brave Ausi wine label !! But surely the wine isn't se crazy wine lable  
Please watch the final episode of The Men Who Made Us Fat this evening, 9pm on BBC2, really important series 
Look at my cool service lift at Union Jacks look what happens when the pizza c Union Jacks Holborn London  
please support this special young lad who i met recently also called Jamie, his courage inspires me  Thank you J x 
I really like my old dr friend BUT we always seem to wear the same c amazing Bavaria Germany  
Anouther normal cooking day in the office amazing Bavaria Germany  
Nice view good morning everyone above Battersea  
Those lovely people at C4 have given me a scrapbook page. Recipes & clips u can cut out and keep forever! Take a peek  
Recipe of the day guys nice little pasta   
And a few more pics for the road! gonna take the olympic torch on a culinary tour, gonna Newport Essex UK  
Wow what a day I carried the Olympic torch !! It was a real treat especially t Running with Olympic Torch  
Hi guys exciting day as I'll be running with the Olympic Torch today at 12:30 through Ne Newport Essex UK  
cute Ollie is a chef to watch out for!. Much love JO xxx 
Morning and evening everyone Recipe of the day www.jamieoliver/com/vegetarian-recipes/purple-potato-salad  
shooting me getting shot by them getting shot by those getting sho union jacks Covent Garden  
Hi guys instagram Recipe of the day. Crispy fried salmon with spring veg. #jamie   
#recipeoftheday always loved Asian flavours, beef with pak choi, mushrooms and noodles
 
Tickets available now come on down I'm camping and cooking and doing demos every day feastival  
Hi guys heres a Recipe of the day. Sweet crispy Asian duck legs cooked with plums. Yu   
Ahhh just seen my lovely wife in Red Mag this month, I'm a lucky man Red Mag  
Wow I love my new Bespoke CAPS there sooooo cool me and the gang at Ja   
Here's My sheep for Jamie's italian and Barbecoa my farmer is so so fantastic it makes me pro Oxfordshire  
hello tiger. great vic sponge tips here from my pal Peter. Let me know how you get on  
thanks bro. If you havent seen it check out my chat with here  
#recipeoftheday summer pea and watercress soup, simple, simple, simple
 
Me and Chris Bianco about to start training at Union Jacks Covent Garden it's gone b Covent Garden London  
Tonight ch4 8pm is my summer BBQ special I'm really proud of it and think its so Feastival Clapham London  
Thanks to for everything you did on Saturday JO x 
Guys please watch my Summer Food Rave Up show tonight on C4 at 8.30. It's a recut of last years BBQ show with added feastival fun. JO xxx 
Want to know how to prepare the perfect salad?  
Try Mark Hix new restaurant "Tramshed" really lovely room great service Tram Shed Rivington Street London  
Bambi lives: I'd like to formally thank Audi for making the best ceramic brakes in the country road Essex  
Head chefs of Barbecoa rocking it out!!!! Pull another one off chef- wee chef !!( pulled pork subs!!)  
look hot ready to do pasta master class!! Thanks 15 westland place, city road london  
Thanks to all that came to the street party every food truck sold out 15 westland place, city road london  
Thanks to all that came to the street party every food truck sold out 15 westland place, city road london  
Fifteen street party was great-loads of instagramers !!! Respect I lo 15 westland place, city road london  
jayjayburridge's amazing bespoke caps top  
See you tomorrow at the Fifteen street party all the best street foo 15 westland place, city road london  
I can't believe it jools has the baby's trained up to eat frozen peas frozen as treats !!! A frozen peas  
The Eagle has landed " Jamie's Italian cap badges & bakery badges are here from the US jamie's at Gatwick  
#recipeoftheday ever cooked chicken in milk?  
New Espadrilles !!!!! Hand Made by an amazing stranger who made a pair for the family - how sweet I Essex  
eat_unionjacks's photo  
Street party with the best street food vendors in London!!! Super exciting come 15 westland place london  
#recipeoftheday today I give you awesome spinach and ricotta cannelloni  
what response shaun I'm sorry for the noise but someone has I move its an issue with our land lord for you and him to settle 
happy birthday love jamie xx 
Buddy getting down and dirty with an Oliver fruit smoothie... What a mess but best way to Central london  
Buddy getting down and dirty after a oliver smoothly bet way to get the good stuff in them Central london  
just come along bro its open to all jamie o ill be there till after lunch 
Come and help me celebrate 10 years of Fifteen this Saturday starting at 11 we're having a street party. JO xxx  
Pukka mate south london  
#recipeoftheday spicy broad bean fritters with lemon minted yoghurt, so good  
#recipeoftheday tasty and good for you, Baked white fish with olives and a simple olive sauce  
A very Olympic Tower Bridge with grumpy clouds Tower Bridge  
Looking for passionate chefs at Jamie's italian in Gatwick to work with my team great fresh food loadsa oppo  
Me and Jamie's italian after he finished his art work for Gatwick airpo Gatwick airport  
Do you have trouble sharpening a knife?  
your the man thank you jools lives you joxxx 
haha enjoying your food as we speak thank you pay joxxxx 
happy first guys good luck and enjoy it jox c x 
It's my 12 year anniversary today, wow what a journey!! since the age of 19!! thanks for e Central london  
we try hard my friend thanks for comment I'll pass on to team jo 
sorry babe I'm not sure what I can do about that go early or later Into service and it should be easier it's just very busy Jox 
Today I fancy duck and Chianti Ragu with home made pappardelle rosemary and tomato ......... Summerset UK  
me and my 4 girls love it mate so ill do what i like 
marinate rub with olive oil seasoning place in oven 170 cook for around 2.5 hours on herbs and onion cover with grease proof 
good to meet you jo 
cool exciting year 11 here we come good luck to him 
New album, A Million Lights, out this week. We love Cheryl.  PH 
Thank you for the most amazing smelling candles there brilliant love it J O x  
hi guys you will love this !! very very cool take a look jamie ox
 
#recipeofthday try it, you might just like it, grilled peach salad with bresaola and a creamy dressing  
Don't forget to watch The men who made us fat tonight, BBC 2 at 9pm, cracking series!  
Hi guys I just done an exiting new menu 4 Jamie's Italian click here & have a glass of PROSECCO on me!! bless jamie x
 
I love this beautiful arm chair covered in an old flour sack I love the old industrial de A special place  
Hi tiger, we have some great forum members on my site who help each other with recipes and hints and tips  
hello, what is that? sounds interesting J 
#recipeoftheday tasty I say, apple and walnut risotto with gorgonzola  enjoy Jx 
What a shame, another #realfood opportunity missed by US senate RT Gillibrand healthy food amendment defeated 33-66. #FarmBill 
what did you cook? 
defo, this one is easy peasey and people seem to love it! chicken fajitas with home-made guacamole and salsa... 
Pimped summer victoria sponge !!! Oooooohhh thank u Cake world  
Me and Lord photographer extraordinaire or all my cook books and pl Hanging out by the door  
#recipeoftheday simple one today, lovely Greek salad  enjoy J x 
cool I'll be up there in a few days tell her to Say hi 
I'm Whack job !! thanks guys what ever that means 
haha good man good luck learn to control the wood oven get a infa red thermometer of amizon this will help you joxx 
Excited to be inspired by the energy of the incredible OneYoungWorld delegates again this year! I cant wait love jamie oliver 
Recipease cooking store coming soon !!! Notting Hill gate it's gonna be amazing can't w Notting Hill Gate  
great response to The Men Who Made Us Fat and well deserved to, second episode airs BBC2 this Thursday at 9pm  
At "La Web London" looks like a formidable audience gonna do a chat with from instagr LaWeb London  
This is possibly really good news for all uk parents may be a jerno can get some clarity have a read  
Weather is good tonight!!! Stuck in traffic outside the most bling watch in the world !! Going t Big Ben  
Nice one mate, let us know what you cook from it 
This will impress tiger, try my recipe for monkfish with black olive sauce and lemon mash!  J x 
#jamiescookingtips a weekly little snippet from me to help you in the kitchen, this weeks tip is how to chop an onion  
nice one elliot hope your well bro yep a long time it has been good to see your still cooking man grilling rocks nice one jo x 
Dario Ceccini ( best butcher in the world) has a vision !! While we source the best prosciutto in t Italy  
#jamie me two dads and a nephew thanks for a great day with all the family!! Mum & Dad's house Essex  
I'm very well thank you yes I must come in and see u again I loved it last time love to team 
Family over from America so gonna spit roast over wood !! Pulled pork my soft buns a new salsa and crazy salad from the garden good times jx 
wipe with damp cloth 
not the best game ive ever seen 
got Jools this super cool "Pendleton Somerby bike" and she really loves it thank u Victoria Deep Essex UK  
Got to have a quick drive of the Morgan three wheeler SUPERDRY edition very cool nippy and Regents street  
Buckingham palace with children that cooked for the queen - another normal day in the o Buckingham palace  
Stay strong Martha, RT this to show your support #neverseconds  Jx 
These guys make a good home video showing Dome 60 wood oven great job guys  
Me and my inspirational friend sir paul smith .... Dude of all dudes in his famous qwerty o Paul smith hq  
thank you, a great woman indeed! 
hello Dublin! #recipeoftheday today is in your honour - steak, guinness and cheese pie  
The Men Who Made Us Fat airs tonight BBC2 9pm - it's a must watch!  join debate here  #cornsyrup 
#recipeoftheday because it is sunny in London I give you crunchy keralan salad  enjoy! J x 
finally the sun is out!!! i forgot what it was like..... good morning everyone big love jamie 
Amaro my dear friend hope your well brother jamie oxx 
The Men Who Made Us Fat, BBC2 9pm Thurs 14th June, obesity costs the NHS more than £4bn a year - it's a must watch!  
sounds good tiger! 
#recipeoftheday inspired by my recipe today I present to you leftover bruschetta  enjoy J x 
To my Aussie lot, thanks for all of the lovely comments about you guys rock! J x 
is it on tv now Nikki? Jox 
Nice one bro, I am quite partial to Pouting as well 
#recipeoftheday ever tried Pouting? give my recipe for Pouting fish fingers a go and let me know what you think  Jx 
Please RT and support Restore fish stocks & end discards! #fishfight 
Yeeeeeeeeah the rain and clouds have gone for a short while the sun is out and my first cro Deep Essex UK  
Help us fight the #obesity epidemic, download our free Giving Assistant & fundraise for free!  #foodrevolution 
has to be pancetta and mint I reckon  
sure do, try them with wine and walnut cream  
#recipeoftheday super super tasty tasty Spanish roast chicken  enjoy! J x 
sure thing bro, i love mine with cherry tomatoes and asparagus  
Nice one, try aubergine and mint topping, one of my favs  
great to see you again as well babe and thanks for supporting 10th anniversary Supper Clubs J x 
love that show! RT RT if you're crazy excited to see and Rick Stein in the #MasterChefAU kitchen next week! 
got a cooking question for me? log onto the forums on my site and ask away  J x 
#recipeoftheday put some spice into your life and try my southern indian vegetable curry  J x 
Hands up who loved the Jubilee celebrations over the weekend? What did you get up to? J x  
must admit I am a bit of a chilli freak! never worked out why, just love the stuff 
parmesan always goes nicely with asparagus, try this recipe  
#recipeoftheday lovely asparagus, mint and lemon risotto  enjoy! J x 
Join Alice Waters, Michael Pollan, Marion Nestle & More To Support Healthy Food In The Farm Bill. We Did! via  
Lovely morning shooting zombies with zed events in Reading great crack only eaten 10 times!!!! Ki Reading  
Check these kids out! RT Our May Blog of the Month the talented  
#jamiesjubileerecipes vote for your favourite Jubilee recipe, just for fun, go on your know you want to!  J x 
Yeeeeeeaaah bro I'm styling my new birthday T-Shirt thanks pascal bless you here is to a grea London town  
loads on the site tiger, picnic  and some of my fav BBQ recipes  
how about my mega chocolate fudge cake?  J x 
#recipeoftheday lovely flavours of Jamaica and Britain in my recipe for Jerk dressed Bristol pork  #jamiesjubileerecipes 
Jubilee drinks did I hear you say?  
#recipeoftheday Baby Yorkshire Puds, give them a go, you know you want to!  #jamiesjubileerecipes J x 
haha goood girl hope you enjoyed it big love jamie ox x 
keep up the great cooking guys big love jamie oliver 
Picnic this weekend did i hear you say?  
glad you liked it, i know it's not really pie weather but this fits perfectly into #jamiesjubileerecipes 
#recipeoftheday today is very Jubilee indeed - Kate and Will's wedding pie  enjoy! J x 
Please watch my mate on ch4 tonight at 9pm in UK in jimmy and the giant supermarket JO xxx  
oh yes! you will love this one tiger  
#recipeoftheday #jamiesjublieerecipe lovely Guinness lamb shank  enjoy! J x 
can't say I have 
John Dory, cod, haddock or red mullet all work well, here is my recipe for Southern Indian seafood soup  
Thank you mate, had a great day at home with the family, nothing beats that I reckon 
snap! that is the #recipeoftheday today 
#recipeoftheday #jamiesjubileerecipes all from Jamie's Great Britain book this week starting with  enjoy! J x 
looking good mate, loads of Wood Fired oven recipes for you here  
thnks everyone for your kind birthday wishes! had a great day yesterday with the family J x 
No Way! 
a few of you asking about barbecuing this weekend, check out my tips on how to barbecue  what challenges do you have? 
here you go  
#recipeoftheday my favourite barbecued chicken recipe for you all  what's yours? Jx 
here you go mate, from the Food Rev day website, Caesar salad on the lighter side  
Nice pic! love x 
Chelsea Flower show rocks the party very cool Chelsea flower show!!!  
Americas Chris Bianco rocks the naked chefs scooter to Chelsea flower market!!!!!! Chelsea flower show!!!  
One for me one for the recipe! x 
#recipeoftheday lovely day in old London town, it's good to be back, nice salad for you all  enjoy@ Jx 
he is the best good old jimmy!! 
thanks to everyone who got involved in food revolution day it was epic loads to share v soon back home with my babys now & a sunny day happy 
i had a great day thank u joxx 
Ok I'm milking it now no more pics I promise I'm gonna collaborate with Harvard Harvard university Boston  
I won the healthy cup for food campaigning!!! Very pleased and surrounded by ve Harvard university Boston  
At Harvard school of public health- such a dream to be here for an essex boy wo Harvard university Boston  
Guys please add comments about things that matter to you about food farming sch Harvard university Boston  
massive thanks to for my copy of #ram that has just arrived. thnaks mate. lots of love JO xxx 
you the man that chicken was so good and simple I wanna cry I dreamed all night about it. See you soon yoda respect joxx 
great job respect keep up the great work jamie ox 
Yummy dinner at thanks guys brilliant house cured meats , beers, d Coppa 253 Shawmut Boston  
WOW u are amazing! RT #FoodrevolutionDay This was Jeddah, SAudi Arabia's shout out to Jamie!  
What better way to finish weekend than with an incredible lunch with amazing friends! #realfood 
Time Square for interview!  
On my way to for their obesity themed show. Can't wait. Make sure you tune in! 
Ahhh finally a bath!!! ACE hotel is cool off to work now bunch of tv and interviews then o In a hot bath  
Just got back to NYC Empire state building looks cool in green!! NYC  
My Day dinner at last night was bloody amazing. Thank you so much for having us guys! 
What an incredible day Day was yesterday. How did you all celebrate? #realfood 
Google HQ LA LA land  
watch this  
thank u I'll come one day I can't wait ! Joxx 
morning guys FOOD REV DAY was great! thanks2all that took part. last count was 62 countries 620 cities getting involved amazing big love jox 
well done lindsey sounds great 
What an AMAZING #FoodRevolution Day!! the first of many i hope. I'm SO inspired by everyone out there working for #RealFood. BIG LOVE jx 
Google hang out rocks !!! Thanks google and all the guests what a great experience love jamiexx  
More Photos from live google hangout NOW!! watch at  #foodrevolution  
Google hanging out! Join now!!! talking around the world LIVE  #foodrevolution #realfood  
Countdown to + hangout!!  
A few minutes til my + hangout!!! Join in  
my french brother thanks for dropping by your a top man I hope to see you tomorrow big love Jo 
Check out the hotdog winners of the #mofilm award!!  
Getting ready to say hello to the crowd!  
Cooking demonstration kicking off love it  
Just heard my buddy is going to be at to celebrate with me. See you soon champ! 
Almost at to have some Day fun. Everyone come down and join in. All welcome! Can't wait to see you all. 
See you soon and for some more awesome Day celebrations! 
Love it! 
Ok guys heading to the shortly to continue Day celebrations with my team. Who is coming down to join in?! 
Wow guys can't get enough of seeing what you are all doing for Day. Keep em coming! #realfood 
joining me in standing up for real food today? It's day, we've gone global!  Jx 
Only 2 hours till the Day event at with my awesome team. Come down and get involved!! 
Just hooked up with Roy choi from LA one of the best street food dudes in the country! What a lovely man here's to Korean takos joxxx 
day and Champions League final. What are you all cooking up? Good luck Chelsea!! ;) 
OMG I'm loving reading what you are all doing for day. Unreal, I'm so proud. Now heading for some lunch with some great friends! 
People of LA! Who is coming down to the today to celebrate Day with me. Loads going on from 2pm. Come and say hey! #realfood 
Great seeing you yesterday Are you supporting Day today? Lots of love Jamie O x 
653 cities all taking part in Day today! I hope you are all enjoying #realfood with friends and family. Love you all JOxxx 
Yeah it is!“@Alyssa_Milano: It's #foodrevolution day! Join global movement and make a change.  
Guys don't forget to join me tonight for the hangout. Ill be live from8pm EST / 5pm PST live! Details at  
Thank you for the support lovely 
Thanks for having me and for your support with Day! Today is going to be amazing! 
First up today day interview with the charming . Let's talk about real food baby! 
amazing!“@ChloeVGreen: Some very proud little chefs!  
Thanks beautiful JOx 
Can't wait to see it buddy“@IAmJermainDefoe: Also guys what are you cooking to celebrate #FoodRevolution Day i'll show u my attempt later 
Wow Guys!!“@JamiesItalianUK: our first attempt in #Bristol!! 50 metres!! Getting there!  
Thanks Mate“@jamiecullum: Today is #foodrevolution day. Are you celebrating with real food?  
LOVE THIS!“@JamiesFifteen: Our apprentices in action #foodrevolution day  
Happy Day everyone! I have a crazy day in LA to celebrate but I want to see and hear what you lot are up to. #foodrevolution 
Oh that's right. It's FOOD REVOLUTION DAY!!! Woooohoooo 
Ummm... I have a feeling that something was happening today. Any ideas?? 
Thanks for supporting love Jx 
amazing, love it! 
brilliant what are you doing guys 
On food revolution day where trying to break the world record for longest spaghet Jamies italian Bristol  
Yes! RT Check out apprentices cooking up fresh pizzas Borough Market  
Love it! 
woo! Is it on the map? How are you celebrating?  
You can! 2day is the day to join the #foodrevolution!  
Yeah! It's all about real food! RT I don't eat as much fast food as i used to because of #foodrevolutionday 
AMAZING! RT our first attempt in #Bristol!! 50 metres!! We're getting there!! Big love x  
Loving all the amazing events happening all over the world for day today! Check this out  
If you're in London check out the amazing apprentices at Borough Market making pizzas for day!  
Ok not quite world record as that 3000ft but still really long. Happy food rev day!!! Xxx 
Guys. Get down to Park Street Bristol at 11am. We are trying to break the record for the longest pasta strand! 
HONG KONG “@FoodRevHK: Great fun at Culinart today for #foodrevolution day lunch & cooking #realfood  
WOW! “@FoodRev: Love this batik cloth from Indonesia!  
thanx for your help today mate! #FoodRevolution legend!! 
Over 636 cities doing something for #FoodRevolution Day! Host a dinner party  and GET INVOLVED!! RT RT 
YES u are right #FoodRevolution will storm the SF ferry building tomorrow  ....OH YEH 
If it's Day where you are let me know where you are and what you are all doing to celebrate! #foodrevolution 
It's here!! “@Sy_Brighton: Happy Day to all those in the Southern Hemisphere! Enjoy standing up for real food. #foodrevolution” 
Thanks buddy. Looking forward to seeing you tomorrow. 
Thanks Guys! JOx 
YES RT Was short on time 2day but instead of fast food came home & cooked my kids healthy food because of #foodrevolution 
respect bro thanks for all your help jamie o x 
Wow what an amazing day in New York, thanks to all involved. Next stop Los Angeles Day SO EXCITED  
BOOM  loved seeing you today guys, bigg luv j 
Can you spot the NASA Space Ship!!! Cool very cool JFK airport  
Flying pig-great food you are a true friend and a great cook. Spotted pig nyc  
YEAAHHH!! RT What are you cooking tomorrow to celebrate #FoodRevolution Day? 
Spotted pig lunch in aid of food fev day thank you April and ken your the best !!!!! Joxx Spotted pig nyc  
What an incredible lunch! Thanks to everyone at You guys rock! 
Recipe for a Day. Love This!  
Loving my Day lunch! Amazing food, great conversation and passionate people. Exactly what Food Rev Day is all about! 
Brilliant! RT the last of our fruit being dispatched #foodrevolution  
Now on my way to my Day lunch at with my dear friend Anyone can host a dinner party! 
See you soon tiger #foodrevolution 
Next stop interview at Sky and BBC. Then for my very own Day lunch! #foodrevolution 
Big love to the Yankees for getting behind food revolution day NYC  
Cooking at Yankee stadium its nearly #realfood day NYC  
601 cities taking part in Day!!! Wow wee! Thank you guys #foodrevolution 
Just heard there are 598 cities taking part in Day. Wow! Can we crack 600 by tomorrow? #foodrevolution 
The Yankee's support Food Revolution Day!! with there healthy home programme which is grea Yankee stadium  
My dear Instagramers friends please help me do some good today, I would love you to post up coo #realfood  
Next Stop..Yankee Stadium! See you soon #foodrevolution 
Thanks for having me hope you enjoy my Caesar Salad on Day #foodrevolution  
Almost time!! 
@FoodRev #foodrevolution  
Only 20mins away from cooking my Day dish live on . What are you guys cooking? #foodrevolution 
On the way to the with my Day team and  
First up for this morning heading to the ! Tune in at 8:30am so see what I'll be cooking up for Day! 
Happy Day Eve everyone! I'm in NYC! Stay tuned for all the updates. What r u all doing for #foodrevolutionday ? 
Is there something you always wanted to ask me? Submit your video question here and I may answer it on CNN!  
Wow I hadn't seen that in a while. Reminds me why we need a food revolution. Thanks for being part of it man. 
Look what my buddy is cooking up for day  Love It! 
Some amazing Food Revolutionary dinners happening across America this wknd for a lucky few. Hurry and grab your seat!!  
Check out the amazing #FoodRevolution menu at the UCLA cafeteria on may 19th!!  
Looking forward to seeing you both buddy! Thanks so much for your support. Bring on Day !! #foodrevolutionday 
Thanks for supporting love Jx 
Love it! RT Hope you like my video for #foodrevolution  
Guys if you believe in feeding out kids real food and educating them how to feed themselves better follow  
Guy if you love real food passionate farmers and food producers and chefs an Food revolution day may 19th  
thank you my great friend! RT day is nearly here! Stand up for real food! Grazie x  
#recipeoftheday a special treat for you Sizzling Beef with Spring Onions and Black Bean Sauce  enjoy! J x 
Morning guys I love the band The Charlatans & just put out a great book called "Telling Stories" look  Jo 
joining day this wknd mate? It’s all about real food & we’re going global!  Jx 
Fishy Fishy! me and Gannaro catch some nice trout.... Thanks for pic Yeo Valley Bristol  
Yeo Valley Dairy with my two buddy's and great chefs Gannaro Contaldo and Chris Bianco Yeo Valley Bristol  
My floor,my feet,my love, my my Jamies italian Bristol  
have you heard about Join the global movement this wknd, it’s going to be huge!  Jx 
Exciting! Lots of great recipes on here for you  
sounds amazing, any pics to share? 
hi mate is going global! Are you in? Join us and stand up for real food! Jx 
is going global this wknd! Love to have you on board to stand up for real food? Jx 
It's nearly day! What do you lovely lot have planned?  Jx 
Awesome!! 
What you cooking for this weekend mate? It’s on Sat & it’s going to be huge!  Jx 
Looks great! 
Love this day event! Making better burgers from scratch, the buns, the ketchup, the mayonnaise & the burger!  
Love this!! RT Check out this awesome event! A school cook-off taking place for #foodrevolution day  
#recipeoftheday recipe, funny title but it's good Chilli Con Jamie  enjoy! J x 
it's all on here  get involved this weekend! 
will you join me and and stand up for REAL food this wknd?  Jx 
Thanks!! 
Me & Chris Bianco open in Winchester next week staff are so cool wood ovens lite Union Jacks Winchester  
Cooking up anything special for day this wknd mate?  Jx 
Yeah! Have an event this Sat and add it to our map, so much going on across the world!  
hi tiger are you joining me in standing up for real food this wknd?  Jx 
Check this out guys JOx campaign  - RT if you believe young people are the talent of Tomorrow #PTtomorrow 
Wooo! Is yours joining?! RT Wow! We are very close to having 500 cities around the world joining on 19 May:  
what’s on the menu for day this weekend love?  Jx 
#recipeoftheday another special recipe for you today Baked White Fish with Olives and a Simple Tomato Sauce  
Amazing! RT Check out this great #foodrevolution day event - a 'pass it on' cooking class!  
Really looking forward to the Screw Business as Usual event today! Some incredible speakers and minds. 
Thanks babe, great way to start the day x 
#recipeoftheday nice recipe Chargrilled Chicken Kebabs with Peppery Rocket Salad and Smokey Barbecue Salsa  Jx 
in Epping way there's loads or do what I do just plant 5 plants in 5 different areas and some settle and keep coming back etc jox 
Me and my rabbit - no its a dear pet before you ask !!! But I have many recipes if yo   
Yaaaaaaay New seasons garlic is in da house!!!! So many recipes to come you can use a   
Me and me geese gonna go pick some asparagus now thank god the rain stopped! Joxx  
Me and my geese on 360 bubble scope   
thanks so much its been joy to do union jacks such fun jox 
pleasure anytime bro j.o 
A 'Little Bird' comes alive !! so proud of my loverly wife well done babe jo x x xxxx
 
Thanks for supporting day!  Jx 
Love that is cooking Shepherds Pie for #foodrevolutionday Check this out  Thanks mate c u Monday! 
Thanks so much for the video  and support for #foodrevolutionday See you in LA! 
“@JamiesItalianUK: Check out wicked recipe of the day #YUMMY  enjoy and have a good weekend Jx 
Listen up guys! RT Help bring back food education. Sign the pledge  & stand up for REAL food! #FoodRevolution 
“@zatararabe: hola esteban desde en bogota me estoy vinculando con para el 19 de mayo.”BOGOTA! 
and the lovely Antonio Carluccio as well......Two Greedy Italians, 8pm on BBC2 tonight, thank you thank you J x 
Please watch the legend that is Gennaro Contaldo, Two Greedy Italians, 8pm on BBC2 tonight, thank you thank you J x 
nice suggestions for you could also try my recipe for prawns and spaghetti J x  
sounds interesting, what is it? J x 
How about Jools stew  RT oxtail stew been in ages, Dumplings and crusty bread..get innnnn 
Big thanks to the lovely for her #foodrevolution day video & dinner party, check it out!  Jx 
Shooting the shooter   
Guys found this wicked new phone gadget 360 instant stills and video and community so   
 Shocking but inspirational blog. Keep going, Big love from Jamie x 
here are some easy curry pastes to make  let us know how you get on 
good idea 
sounds great mate! 
#recipeoftheday simple, the best pasta salad  enjoy! Jx 
AMAZING!.... Nairobi and Milan...RT welcome into the Revolution :)#foodrevolution #FRDmi 
Thanks for your support! Jx 
Amazing thank you!! RT Join for #FoodRevolution Day by hosting your own dinner party! Watch :  
nice one, try Jool's favorite beef stew next, its a winner!  
#recipeoftheday well, it's a few recipes, our online editor Jim's story on lamb including loads of recipes to try  Jx 
New dishiest gone one the menu...Smashed spring peas and broad beans marinated lamb shoulder and Barbecoa  
Awesome, check out day video!  Cheers mate! Jx 
#recipeoftheday a recipe video for you from Ministry of Food, Mini Shell Pasta With A Creamy Smoked Bacon And Pea Sauce  
EMPIRE ROAST CHICKEN is the dish the followers R cooking 2day 4 all of u that have never cooked it BEFORE here u go  JOX 
bro that looks good i just cooked that too!!! 
Happy cinco de mayo guys jx 
SAN FRANCISCO - check out what my mate Jessica is doing at Bar Jules, via  
its the weekend ! its not raining!!! right im off to buy some food.got a load of asparagus in the garden gonna come up with something tasty 
May the 4th be with you ! star wars fans stand united Death star  
blimey that doess look reem!! 
thanx so much 
Sao Paulo....smashing it for #FoodRevolution Day! 4 events  go !!! 
Wow! you guys are amazing thank you, thank you we just reached 1 million fans on my Facebook page!   
wow that was quick! only posted the Tuna burger recipe this morning 
always loved Star Wars  #MayTheFourth 
Can we get 1 million FB fans today? #MayTheFourth be with you guys!  #ff 
#recipeoftheday something simple for a Friday night - The best tuna burger  have a good weekend everyone! J x 
Guys, check out awesome dinner party & video for #foodrevolution day!  
Cheers for the day video loving the knife skills mate! Jx 
looking good, well done! 
#recipeoftheday ok i know it's a grey day here in London but i am going to make it sunny with Mexican Street Salad  Jx 
Definately! Let's get Indonesia to the map for day!!  
how about a simple crunchy side salad?  enjoy J x 
YES definately! Add your events to the map for day! RT what `bout #FoodRevolution in Russia? 
Amazing!! RT is having a dinner party for #foodrevolution day! What do you have planned?  
Got some special videos coming soon for you lot for day on here  stay tuned!! 
cheers for your support mate! 
#recipeoftheday tray-baked lamb with aubergines, tomatoes, olives, garlic and mint oil  enjoy! Jx 
Nice one mate for supporting  
What it's all about! RT Have you taken a stand for real food & better food education?Join the #foodrevolution!  
nothing to heavy, how about some smoked salmon? try this recipe out  J x 
#recipeoftheday you will love this, I know it, I know it! the best sausages with braised lentils and crispy prosciutto  
Have dinner with me Live.  I LOVE Hangouts for organising this!! #foodrevolution 
amazing!! RT Cool piece on how pea plants communicate with one another...  
my dinner for #FoodRevolution Day .... TA-DAAAA!!  
GREAT get it on the site and I will tweet it RT hosting my own dinner party ! #FoodRevolution #winesbyraz  
You can do it yourself darlin, go for it RT I wish you'd come to my school and liven up the menu a little! 
here's the JAPAN event  sx love from JAPANxx #foodrevolutionday 
thanks mate 
WE all do! RT TURKEY absolutely needs a #FoodRevolution!! 
me too mate, take care 
Amazing!! thanks mate RT #foodrevolutionday Thanks, I'll check it out. 
We need you ISRAEL  RT How about Israel, we can use a #foodrevolution too!!!!! 
Cool MEXICO event  you shoud come to Mexico here we have amazing food come #FoodRevolution 
WE NEED YOU South Africa  RT South Africa!!!! #foodrevolution #foodrevolutionday 
2 really COOL events in Brazil  and  #FoodRevolution 
OK, which bus is that then??!! RT come to Malaysia! We need #foodrevolution here! And we love you <3 
LUV THIS RT Great visual from Food Revolution on "Bring(ing) Food Education Back"!  
what a great idea! Kids dinner party, luv that.  
We need more support in GREECE -  Greece LOVES you too!!!! Come her #foodrevolution!!! 
luv u 
following u mate, happy birthday for may 19th 
BIG LOVE ITALY jx RT Hi Jamie!!! Come on to Italy!!!A lot of italian people need #foodrevolution ;) 
thanks! jx RT Are you supporting #FoodRevolution Day on 19/5? We need to bring food education back!  
BIG LOVE MOTREAL RT im in! We need more support in montreal! 
if u host a #FoodRevolution day dinner I'll follow u mate 
sounds perfect! host a dinner party here  
NICE ONE RT We're supporting #FoodRevolution by eating fresh local produce with our guests on #foodrevolutionday 
YEP RT I'm doing healthy grocery store tour with dinner party recipes, does that count? :) #foodrevolution 
LUV THAT!!! RT we are hosting a stand-up comedy night to raise monies for #foodrevolution day! 
yep that counts  RT We will join you plus Luke's children as we are babysitting, does this count? 
...and another  RT love to 😃😃 
We have diner!  RT ok done!!! X 
all u have to do is host your own dinner party, like  #FoodRevolution  
GREAT mate - get your dinner booked in  RT I'm in! May 19th, it's going to be great! 
so who's joining me for a dinner on May 19th then....  ??? #Foodrevolution 
Awesome! Check out dinner for day on May 19  #foodrevolutionday 
So many great tweets and support for #foodrevolution today, thanks guys!! May 19, get involved here  
Thanks for your support! 
Yes! RT It’s time for a #FoodRevolution!  - Stand up for real food on May 19 #foodrevolutionday 
thanks bro! excited about #foodrevolution 
Thank you Tom, excited about day! 
Thank you for your support, means allot to me! very excited about  J x 
loookn good! 
#recipeoftheday special chicken stew for you today  have a good one! J x 
so funny i love Jimmy Kimmel he is the man!! check out video infront of the president
  
well see yeah some good stuff coming out end of summer bro 
toochee very funny never saw it probably in a kitchen basment in soho very funny moonwalk out of trouble genious 
they all never do me been told im to hard to do ? 
must be an i lived in a pub youd think id be more clued up 
they never do me mate apparently im to hard ive been told ,i think its my voice even 118118 guess its me well see 
haha no idea what your talking about ,death match? but bless you have a good one 
yep spot on some how but ont know quite how 
he was good but your right she was strong 
christ your old yes it was good i was about 5 when that was out sadly its to expensive for tv these days may be in the futer 
i recon the girl is dame good 
laughing my head off at the best new comedy on TV ....watch "Very Important People" on   
158 cities on the map for Food Revolution Day!! Add yours by hosting a dinner party for friends and family on 19th May  
158 cities on the map for Food Revolution Day!! Add yours by hosting a dinner party for friends and family on 19th May  
Thanks Dex! nice one RT Join for #FoodRevolution Day?!  Check it out & get involved on May 19 
From the storm into the sunlight then a beautiful rainbow that chased us !!! Fan Chopper view Glastonbury  
#recipeoftheday today I am serving Souvlaki for you - or as I call them Wicked kebabs  enjoy and have a great wkend Jx 
Fifteen Cornwall graduation year seven amazing !!! Everyone has a job to go Fifteen Cornwall graduation  
definitely Ministry of Food, some great family recipes there, also loads of recipes on my website  
Never par boil them, cut into wedges, toss with little oil & season roast at 190-200, 25 – 30 mins good luck J 
Turn steak every minute in hot pan till done baste with the sauce each time its turned to build up a sticky layer, good luck 
Check these kids out!! RT Why do we need a #FoodRevolution? Kids from Chicago tell us exactly why!  
Just got a copy of first cook book!! which is genuin A girl and her pig April Bloomfield  
fresh is always best 
sure has  
if you like that one you will love the 30MM chicken green curry as well i am sure  
nice one bro! 
#recipeoftheday lovely, lovely, lovely tagliatelle with spinach, mascarpone and parmesan  enjoy! Jx 
Thank you for running Supper Clubs to support you guys rock!  Jx 
#recipeoftheday love this one! Spring poached chicken  enjoy Jx 
The window at filming star wars and a rainy day!! Cooking going well today 6 meals dow Star wars are back  
#recipeoftheday lovely chargrilled chicken kebabs from the Day website  have you signed up for an event yet? Jx 
will do ! why dont you come down and surprise him at lunch time 230 bring kids bubbles cake ?? steal my mobile from his phone 
wow i love it; Two Greedy Italians, Series 2 - Still Hungry, Calabria and Bambinone, Chocolate and Pig's Blood Pudding  
loving your work guys jxx 
thanks mate 
you need to dm mate jx 
top work luv that one 
Get involved ppl! Add ur food events to the map RT What do you have planned for #foodrevolution day?  
Mine as well J 
Looking good! 
to my Dutch lot - enjoy and have a great weekend!  Jx 
#recipeoftheday another favourite from Ministry of Food - quick salmon tikka with cucumber yoghurt  enjoy! Jx 
Looking good! 
Awesome infographic by let’s bring back food education, join #foodrevolution day!  
Thanks Man! Really appreciate it 
we worked together here in London ages ago and he has taught me so much, love him! 
the one and only Gennaro 
sure is babe! Jx 
"The two Greedy Italians" premiers tonight on BBC 2 8pm its great !!!! The two greedy italians  
they have done, it's called Two greedy Italians - still hungry, tonight on BBc2 at 8pm J 
yep they are, so funny x 
Don't miss the two greedy italians with the lovely gennaro and Antonio tonight on bbc2 at 8.00pm jo xxx 
can't go paste m,y Uncle Ken's recipe mate  
#recipeoftheday sometimes the simplest things in life are the best - humble home-cooked beans  enjoy! J x 
Coolest invitation by an amazing organic dairy farmer for a days fly fishing and cooking - lo Fishy fishy  
BIG LOVE Jx “@FoodRev: Thinking of everyone in Doha at #TEDxSummit.So fun to see on big screen announcing  
THX MATE RT Join me and in standing up for REAL food on Day, May 19 >>  
thank you for supporting Day, means allot to me and the team  Jx 
Quite a specific flavour, smokey, intense - add water to dried chillies, drain then blitz! love chilies Jx 
Slow cooked stew in tomato or braised in red wine and then BBQ'ed! Amazing Jx 
#recipeoftheday to keep you all on your toes it's a video recipe Sizzling Beef With Spring Onions And Black Bean Sauce  
#recipeoftheday for some inspiration for dinner tonight, quick sausage meatballs with spaghetti  enjoy! Jx 
RT Lovin my new Quooker boiling water tap, thanks to the nice peeps at  
Lovin my new Quooker boiling water tap, thanks to the nice peeps at  
Have u added ur school yet?! RT Demand better food education in schools!  Join #FoodRevolution Day on May 19 
THX Ashton mate RT stand up with for #FoodRevolution Day!  Check it out & get involved on May 19! 
#recipeoftheday ribbon celeriac salad, simple recipe if you have not tried celeriac before  Nice one! J x 
Yeah! 
wat a good idea! i luv that 
YEAHHH RT Join the Gidsy Seed Funding on Food Revolution Day (May 19th)! #foodrevolution  
Have dinner w/ JUSTIN Wines & TopChef on #FoodRevolution Day  
oh yeahhhhhh 
scary 
Got food skills & knowledge?! Share them on day May 19. Get involved people & host a #realfood event!  
lovin you boys! brilliant as usual jo xx RT 3G 's in da house with Jamie O 
#recipeoftheday a feast for Friday, Steak Indian stylie steak  enjoy! Jx 
join 45+ countries for #foodrevolution day. Stand up for #realfood and get involved May 19!  
amazing story! RT i lost 35 pounds just going back 2 natural homemade food & i don't mean just lettuces 
NICE RT BBQ plans in full swing for 20th May 250 people to invite let's get crackin #foodrevolution 
just have a search on here love  an set up one if not! 
Thank you! 
real easy, just head over to  and get an event going there! 
Amazing, keep it that way! 
Let's all stand up for #realfood on May 19th  and lets get food education back for everyone! 
NICE ONE! its easy to get involved  already have 45+ countries RT We'll help in any way 
Kids can't identify tomatoes -> check out the video  #foodrevolution day. May 19th #fb 
it is crazy isnt it, and thats on 2 different continents 
sure - everything is at  
that video is crazy isnt it.... 
crazy huh! RT this is unbelievable Kids can't identify tomatoes -> check out the video  
#FoodRevolution Day fact - Worldwide, obesity has more than doubled since 1980  
Kids can't identify tomatoes -> check out the video  #foodrevolution day. May 19th 
ahhhhhhh bless u thats so lovely #FoodRevolution day! 
thanx for supporting mate #FoodRevolution Day! 
dont be nervous 
glad you like the vids #FoodRevolution 
SI!!!! RT spero tu voglia partecipare, il successo dipende da voi #foodrevolution 
sometimes pasta....sometimes salad too mate!! RT #foodrevolution pizza!! 
thanks and for getting on board #FoodRevolution Day #realfood !!! 
#recipeoftheday one of my favs especially if you are not feeling well Spring poached chicken  Jx 
#recipeoftheday lovely taglierini with a simple sweet tomato sauce and shrimps  enjoy! Jx 
my lovely friend Aprils book is out today JOxx RT heres a pic of it..what a gr8 cover..  
Looking good! 
#recipeoftheday a new one for you all on the site today - soy-baked salmon with zingy salsa  enjoy! Jx 
congrats 2 Mikeyk KevinS and all the team in San Fran congrats guys great job magic if you dont know who instagram is get with it 
bro John Hamilton proudly gave it to me last week bro thank you can't wait to read it he said its proper good...hope your well 
Alabama shakes on X FM in uk at 8 pm tune in guys wicked band 
Jox 
thank you the fifteen crew are amazing and do such a great job on the food community and students well proud 
not a bad idea at all, especially if your from usa!! where there is less transparency about hidden ingredients 
good pig, great bread , salsa verdi, great mustards, chilli sauce, crunchy fresh salad and it will be v good !! 
bless you a good idea babe have a few tricks up my sleve not the expected though 
happy easter guys!! have a great day, nice chocolate eggs, family and roast dinners big love jamie oxxx im going to see me nan now AKA tiger 
gotta say im loving the voice 
love the judges 
happy saturday night jox 
Big love to and the team, the new #FoodRevolution Day website  looks fantastic! 
Check out the new Day website  Be the first to register your #realfood events! Hope u love it as much as I do 
2 hours later Nettle Quiche done very happy.... Pick Nic time here we go!!!! have a great E Deep Essex UK  
Just picked Stinging Nettles to make a nettle and Lincolnshire poacher quiche Garden  
that's a good question, chek out the salmon recipes on my site for some inspiration  
I can honestly say that my Mum's trifle is the best that I have ever tried, i love it!  Jx 
#recipeoftheday some lovely recipes for you all to cook over the Easter break  have a good one Jx 
Hi Claire, just replace the wine with extra stock, it will work just as well, Jx 
try making a paste with red chilli oregano lemon zest olive oil, rub over the halloumi, let me know how you get on Jx 
#recipeoftheday better late than never, today it's spicy lamb cutlets with crispy coriander potatoes  enjoy! Jx 
random thought guys Great goats from James Whetlor, herd of 2000 in Somerset-
 there fantastic we've been betting some 
My buddy just published his first cook book he's one of the wo Around the world in 80 dishes  
big love to Food Rev team RT named as #2 online #health influencer on list  
and you can follow the Fresh One gang here as well Jx 
some of what my production company did last year jox very proud of the FreshOne team  
lots of tweets about this recipe, glad people like it, let me know how you get on bro 
#recipeoftheday my kids love this one! 1-minute berry ice cream, so easy  enjoy! Jx #fb 
Happy birthday petal 3 years old and she loves her Dora back pack! And her mini shopping tr Deep Essex UK  
#recipeoftheday because I love them, it's grilled chilli dressing  nice one Jx #fb 
Bunch of different Spuds ready to go in Egg box  
haha best tweet ever cheers jox x 
bad ass meal for this weekend! really easy to do Mechoui lamb inspired by my trip to morocco so good makes people smile  
nice buckwheat crepes for breakie have a great weekend joxx  
hahah yep even the loos !!! cant wait to get back glad you enjoyed 
my pleasure jox 
yeah we dont do that but i think youll get it when you see it im really excited by it and the atmospher is very happy enjoyxx 
yeah id never approve that, its a neighbourhood restaurant and will be half book half walk in sounds like a weird story 2 me 
what a week !!!! check out what ive been up too... big love jamie oxxx  
good on you girl 
sign up, sign up! RT Is Your City Represented? Apply To Be A Food Revolution Day Ambassador Today! -  Jx #fb 
To Russia with love, think I'm gonna need a translator and editor Russia  
Very first asparagus to pop up in my garden, shot on I phone with that blip on macro lens no f Vegi patch  
Nice one Jim! Chiswick opens. Heaven is flat. So bloomin' good here  
Have a good weekend everyone, nice one Jx 
#recipeoftheday chicken fajitas with home-made guacamole and salsa, oh so good!  Jx #fb 
Barbecoa with my bro he boss of instagram big love joxx  
Me and Chris Bianco just opens Union Jack's in Chiswick London so proud of it and 217 Chiswick high road  
Nice one bro, what are you cooking? 
#recipeoftheday it has a bit of a chilli kick and I know you will love it as I do, fresh Asian noodle salad  Jx #fb 
Nice one Jim. Follow him gang. Jo x A big welcome to me! Dazzling food editorial, news, recipes and Jamie updates aplenty. 
#recipeoftheday cause it's quick and easy and one of my favourites home made pappardelle with quick tomato sauce  Jx #fb 
fantastic can't wait to meet the winner !! Jox 
Respect to my buddy Craig Armstrong exec producer of on his great new series Airs Tuesdays at 10/9c great idea good luck JOX 
how did you get im were not even open yet??? your goood come back soon jox 
are you kidding me babe it's been open 2 hours it's only friends and family invited we all have to warm up your a tough cookie 
not sure I will find out bro thanks for heads up that should not happen all the best jo 
#recipeoftheday Spring lamb for you all  enjoy! Jx #fb 
how about trying my recipe for roast veg that has a dash of honey and balsamic vinegar in it?  
try mashing it up pretty roughly with some red chilli, olive oil, feta and coriander, one of my favourite ways to eat them 
#recipeoftheday well, it's a few actually, my favourite BBQ recipes for you all  enjoy! Jx #fb 
nice one! RT@ Congratulations to Dubai winner of this years Time Out Dubai best Family Restaurant Award 2012 
nice one! RT@ Congratulations to Dubai winner of this years Time Out Dubai best Family Restaurant Award 2012 
So proud off dexter #wildbillfilm the papers are reviewing it so well well done cas Islington view cinema  
also leo gregory will be in fulham vue tonight at 9.20 get on down meet the boys and see a great film #wildbillfilm You will love it! JO xx 
Meet Dexter fletcher&Charlie creed-miles they'll be vue cinema showing for the launch of #wildbillfilm good luck boys 
U r the best I miss u! RT LOVE IT!!!  
hi guys my mate dexter #wildbillfilm launches today! independent movie Wild Bill GETS 5 STARS in the mail  jo 
loads of recipes on my site also great forum members from around the world who can help, they are great!  #fb 
#recipeoftheday 30 min meal, mouthfull to say but so good chicken, quick dauphinoise, greens, black forest affogato  #fb 
 
thank you for your tweet how about my recipe for lovely wood fired oven roasted veg for the vegetarians?  
yeah eggplant for all of the Aussies 
both good choices tiger! 
#recipeoftheday A nice vegetarian recipe for you all today aubergine parmigiana  enjoy Jx #fb 
Listen up guys, there are a billion people without clean water & I'm looking 4 friends to help make a difference  #fb 
chopped chilli, chilli chopped and more chilli! Here is my recipe for beans on toast as well  nice one 
#recipeoftheday my moorish pork chops  nice one Mr O x #fb 
check out new kids recipe book  top man! 
#recipeoftheday pasta peperonata  enjoy! Jx #fb 
very true for you but not your fella he can work hard to please 
good luck have a good one 
no its today 
yesssssss good one 
yes 
HAVE A GREAT MOTHERS DAY GUYS hope you have a brilliant day , lots of mothers day recipes if your not sorted already jo  
Every day half the fish caught in the North Sea R being thrown back dead. They call it discard.Join the discard protest  
O peixe é comida, não é lixo! Não jogue fora a proibição de descartes nesta segunda! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Vis is voedsel, geen afval! Ondersteun op maandag het teruggooi verbod! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fisch ist Essen und kein Abfall! Unterstütze das Ende der Rückwürfe am Montag! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fish is food not rubbish! Don't scuttle the discards ban on Monday PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fisk er mad, ikke affald! Brems ikke udsmidningsforbuddet på mandag! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fish is food not rubbish! Don't scuttle the discards ban on Monday PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fish is food not rubbish! Don't scuttle the discards ban on Monday. PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Il pesce é cibo, non immondizia. Lunedí, non bloccate il divieto sugli scarti! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Fisch ist Essen und kein Abfall! Unterstütze das Ende der Rückwürfe am Montag! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
El pescado es comida, no basura! No anulen la prohibición del descarte este lunes! PLEASE RT #fishfight 
Les poissons= nourriture, pas ordure! Ne sabordez pas l'interdiction des rejets en mer ce lundi! #fishfight 
easy recipe for you for meatballs  enjoy 
so proud of everything that we have achieved great night last night, thank you everyone  Jx #fb 
nice one, what's on the menu? 
don't forget to treat Mum this Sunday, lovely recipes here for you all  Jx #fb 
good to see the gang from here, give them a big welcome, more info for you all  nice one! Jx #fb 
whatch a great clip if the #wildbillfilm here.  it is a great movie and is release next week! nice one JO x 
great screening of #wildbillfilm with thanks to the box, Jamesons, Chappeldown my barbecoa boys & JO 
loads more recipes for you  and lovely forum members ready to answer your cooking questions  Jx #fb 
#recipeoftheday the nicest tray baked lemon sole  give it a go and enjoy! J x #fb 
hey Ronnie mate. hope you are well. happybirthday mandi! love JO xx 
here you go babe, try this one  J x 
You can use it plain, or with a grating of orange zest or even a splash of pimms! Jx 
that's a nice treat as well, enjoy Jx 
my good mate David Loftus 
how about tender and crisp chicken legs with tomatos may not be exactly what you are after but it's good  Jx 
for my UK lot, here are some lovely mothers day recipes, go on treat your Mum, I bet she deserves it  Jx #fb 
yep in ministry of food cook book it rocks 
here's a superb spring veg & chicken broth its so good! one of my favourites super easy & goes a long way feed a family
 
happy birthday babe joxx 
back to normal now so recipe of the day is a great italian hunters chicken so good 
 
sorry ive been hacked please bear with me cheers 
no ive been hacked bear with me cheers jox 
Hi guys my buddy Craig Armstrong just made a great new competition series called FASHION STAR starts 2night NBC 9pm/8pm central JO 
sorry guys just been hacked ignore weird tweets working on it love jamie o sorry 
#sosfood Join me and get your MP to stand up and Save Our UK School Food  Thank you Jx 
#recipeoftheday one of my favourites today, super tasty spanish roast chicken  enjoy! Jx #fb 
WELL DONE for continuing the fight against #pinkslime in school food SIGN IT  #foodrevolution 
LETS DO IT! RT What's the Fuss? Pink Slime 101 by Watch=>  #foodrevolution 
Nice one dr aseem jo xxx  
Make sure you jazz it up with lots of fresh lime wedges and coriander leaves serve with sliced fresh red chilli for the brave J 
Roasted beets with a soft curd is delicious, Smoked salmon, lemon and watercress is great too or a flaked smoked trout. Yum Jx 
Check out my food photographer mate first book around the world in 80 di Office London town  
go to a butchers shop and watch them grind it was said its in 80%of all ground beef products watch and grind joxx 
so back home with my dear family which makes me so happy! thank u 2 all the amazing people & food dudes in Australia i just love being there 
thank you i always love being in ausi big love jo x x 
OMG you can watch the plane land!!!! Back home can't wait to see my family I've missed them than Heathrow  
Love the a bit of Qantas A380 I just had the best lounge food ever (respect Neil Perry) in the Q Melborne  
Look out for #AlabamaShakes great band have a look on you tube nice one jamiex Singapore airport  
Jools Oliver's Spring blog... | Articles | Gurgle  
Great news! RT news on Jamie's Ministry of Food opening in Victoria, Aus  Jx #fb 
hay you hope your well big kiss joxx 
Wow the busiest day ever in Melbourne all good though love this city hotel in Australia  
So happy to be back in Melbourne got a great day planed anyone fancy a pint later ? 
Just dropped in on Target hq over in Geelong judged a staff bake off boy those guys can cook good! They should open a restaurant joxxx 
USA military getting fed pink slime 
 
Sun rise in Sydney.....gotta love it ! Off to Melbourne now can't wait big love jamie Sydney harbour  
Only in Australia would you get the best artisan coffee served like this without 78 stanley street Syndey  
Well chuffed Finally found my favourite Aussie apparel ..."three o 441 Oxford Street, Paddington,Sydney,  
Thank you had a great time! RT Lovely staff at Jamie's Italian in Sydney  
Me and my security get a little lunch before going to Jamie's italian Pitt street here's Sydney harbour  
So Happy to be back in Sydney well chuffed with my bedroom view shame I can't share it wi Sydney harbour  
Post saki heaven at great breakfast at anouke padington great coffee Harrisa bacon breakfast!!!  
Off for some breakie in brizzy not sure where to go yet hope it's stopped raining off to Sydney now for a few day 
yum yum I'll try sounds great! 
Roll on Brisbane -Ipswich ....great work guys, 1000 family's already thought to cook ! Logan Queensland  
Bloody Nice brunch at Piaff !Aussie's do it right Brisban grey street  
thanks for the kind welcome messages, so close to having 2 million followers, will number 2 million be from Brisbane? Jx 
landed in Brisbane good to be back can't wait to check out the ministry of food centre in Ipswich today 1230 good stuff see you there jamie 
Heading off to Australia now thank you Korea great stuff.cant wait 2 check in with my old friends, ministry of food Ipswich here we come jox 
Amazing guys check this out the korean chefs collect and save different fins of certain Fish market korea  
Fish market is amazing most the fish is still alive so good sushi for breakfast Fish market korea  
7000 away from 2million followers wow! people from all over the world thanks 4 your support!x lets SEE if we can do it today in Korea JAMIE 
What a great day!!! Korean food is fantastic! Got to eat some old style food toni Zzzzzzz korea zzzzzzzzZ  
Me a my new Korean Chefs.... Sooooooo cute such lovely people amazing food so far joxx Seoul Korea  
Im very excited for my first day in Korea Im going to the markets to check out authentic Korean food a very busy day ahead!! love jamieo 
guys do I fire him or promote him you decide ? 
Big news!!! We are taking the Food Revolution global. Get involved May 19th  thank u #TED 
Happy 21st birthday to 2 very special girls and have a good one, big love Jamie xx 
#TED2012 wish I was there this year. I'll be following on twitter. Massive love to u all j 
try this recipe from my site tiger  
definitely hit it with chillies bro, check this recipe out  
nice one, glad you enjoyed it 
#recipeoftheday risotto of sweet white onions, cotechino sausage and thyme  enjpy! Jx #fb 
is doing a competition on his instagram stream for his new film Wild Bill coming o London town  
good job and a lady in the back ground great result 
EPIC weekend breakfast GUYS! -Glasgow potato scones smoked salmon and scrambled egg Soooooo good worth a try EASY JOXX
 
here's my blackberry tart recipe  enjoy! 
Nice one, you will love it I am sure 
and for a chicken 30 Minute Meal try green curry, crispy chicken, kimchee slaw, rice noodles  enjoy! Jx #fb 
good call! sorry Empire Roast Chicken from Jamie's Great Britain  thanks babe Jx 
roast is great anytime i reckon tiger! 
#recipeoftheday good old chilli con carne!  enjoy Jx #fb 
you know the score 
Free chilli freak Artisan pizza today show this Union Jacks St Giles High Street ,Holborn, london,WC2H8LE  
for a sweet tooth try this wicked shortbread  + check out Jamie Mag, they have lots of goodies going on 
It's a flatbread, come on down today and try one  Jx 
This is one of my faves  mackerel on the griddle or BBQ is amazing.Perfect with lemon, chilli and courgette 
come on down! Union Jacks St Giles High Street ,Holborn, london,WC2H8LE  Jx 
Looks great! works really well with asparagus and other green veg too. Love the drawings! 
Plain flour for your traditional thin crepe style pancakes and self raising for american style. Both are good! 
#Instagram party, free !!chilli freak artisan p Union Jacks St Giles High Street ,Holborn, london,WC2H8LE  
ITV BRITS executive producer why did you cut off Adele! bloody rude ! shame anyway respect Adele well deserved jox 
Thank you Holland !!! A great day at 15 Amsterdam fantastic students positive and professional and what 15 i  
Panic over! For proper pancakes just try this:  or check out the website for some more unusual ones! 
Sure! Loads of vegan pancake recipes out there.. You just need to increase the amount of milk to replace the egg. Good luck! 
try this special one tiger!  enjoy Jx 
big love to the team at Manchester - the restaurant opens today, you guys rock! Thanks for all your hard work Jx #fb 
some lovely pancake recipes for you all for Pancake day tomorrow, enjoy!  Jx #fb 
nice one girl thats what i like to here jox 
hope you live in a part of the world where there in season they taste like crap over here at the moment 
thanks mate jamie does was one of my favourites 
great mate good memories seems a while ago now , were all good hope your well jo 
looks great where is it 
brilliant 
jesus thats scarey where is that from and who for ? 
thanks u 
mate not as excited as me thanks jox 
its delicious mate , pan sear the breasts first time around cook like a steak med rare screaming hot pan you wont regret 
WILD BILL the film by my mate Dexter Fletchers, its his first di Street corner doggey part of east london  
nice one nat good job 
nice well done 
yaaaaay good time comfort to the hilt 
it looks great r u architects?or designer? tell your peeps to simplify the web site, beauty & talent is simple looks great though 
done 
very kind not sure if i deserve it but thank you 
haha cant believe there writing storys before weve even found a site .........one day i hope jox 
thats a good thing 
if they do there job right they will get you back another day have a good night 
love nz wanna come over soon been all over so missing being there jox 
wow your the man following for sure 
few months v excited 
dark room we like,but if you were not happy with the food u should just say mate 2 the manager we get it right most the time jox 
congrats jox 
tell them your my sister they should look after you jox x x 
thanks u xx 
no waiting list its big it can handle it you can book as well 
we make all our own pasta every day on site its the supermarkets that do whole grain in big industrial machines, we do wheat free 
this year if we are lucky jox 
cambridge U that settled that one then 
Manchester Jamie's Italian has opened its doors!!! after 3 long years, it's an ama King street manchester  
theres not one book mate but my personal favourites are ..jamies italy/jamie does/ jamiesbritan/jamie at home there really strong 
brassicas are ok if under nets or tarp mine r fine & had snow last week france or Italian stuff is excellent 
its on my web site type in on the search babe 
have three on the web site bro here is my fav  
60 % of my recipes in my books are veggie your all good 
he will be its great 
its an annoying sauce but can be very nice 
you go girl 
very cute what a great mum u are jox x 
cool im at my restaurant there not enough time sadly for public appearances 
happy birthday have a great one get them to sort you a drink on me !! joxxx 
essex google it its a national trust house and grounds really nice 
any good peach can be fantastic a nice vanilla stock syrup equal suger to liquid (water or wine or a mix)poach until tender 
good girl enjoy jox 
Old school kitchen dresser Audley end house essex  
Nice day at audley end house Victorian cooking was very cool Audley end house essex  
A real bad Ass carrot carrot cake, best topping for recipe  Home  
here is the link again some people said it didnt work seems good my end 
i have a recipe for that on my web site check out its a cracker best topping and moist as !!! 
dont think there is such thing as a healthy cake but if it makes you happy use whole ingredients and moderation youll be fine jox 
have a small slice or dont make it......even little cup cakes are good portion control 
well done it mainly planning and shoping & batch cooking that really makes the difference in speed & saving cash 50% good luck 
i just checked it and everyone else seems to be fine try again  
both brilliant books claire at violet bakery is a genius have you been? 
how sweet mark 
haha hi andy hope your well mate 
hi u gonna bake today? try this amazing lemon drizzle cake! cake 
i agree 
good luck guys great work 
that sounds about right bro post war rationing habbits 
yes thanks 
yes thanks 
if its falling appart feel free to remove it you oven may be slightly hotter 
if they do it properly it will work! if they dont it wont! it Aint rocket science not feeding kids s**t every day from 4 to 18 
this year were workinhg on them for 10 th year aniversary 
bloody hell thats a compliment i think !! good times jo x x 
papprica onions garlic and fry low and slow for half an hour or roast to make reaslly sweet then add stock and crack on 
i dont add milk butter salt pepper low and slow 
fantastic glad you liked it there a great family there thanks for tweet 
classicly a teaspoon 20 grams around that they have said it for years i didnt start it 
my buddy is the best at that stuff  he's the master of bbq stuff check him out jox 
thanks very much we do try proper hard to please and remain great value cheers ill pass on to team 
this guy if funny, works really hard trying to get people to cook check him out ..a proper gorilla cooking show  
oh my lord 
keep doing a great job guys love and respect jox 
400 hundred !! jesus how many a week ? who cuts them for you do you ? thats a loot of content bro 
enjoy your self all the best jamie ox x x 
ahh my virgin kitchen any new videos boy ? 
done 
good luck robb 
have fun mate 
so sweet that made me laugh thank you jox 
looks wicked mate well done jamieox 
enjoy your self ask paul the wine genious to sort you out jox x x 
haha have fun ladys im sure it will be a laugh ....where are you ? 
good lad respect and what a dish simple comfort food 
have a good one bro jamie ox 
not sure what vk is sorry joxx x 
yeah swap out for vegie fish tofo works great there all quick so you wont screw them up 
dont screw with them olive oil salt pepper nobs of butter roast hard and fast cook till flesh pushes away serve with lemon & peas 
ahhh sweet boy reall men cook what do you say girls kun thinks its a womans job !! never to late to start young man love jamie 
love the prices trust big love jamieo 
bless 37 years and dad is still up at 5 every morning gota try his breakfasts there real good 
i love the staff at liverpool they are so kind and sharp and got all the chat thabks mate we do try hard 
just do it have a clear angle test test test the recipes your self and with many others & youll b in a better place than most 
give her my love and wish her god luck !!! jox x x 
roast them bro best way ooh and dont prick them enjoy 
milk 
& better fat free! Yeo valley organic yogurt in all the supermarkets its amazing! & has no added crap like the others jo 
bless you i think i should buy you a drink for that jamie !! 
you the man hope your well hope to meet you some time just not at heart attack grill jamie oliver 
yes friday I just put some delicious quick asian dishes up really good food for friends and waking up those taste buds  
looks fantastic good luck !!!!! 
hope all is well pass on my love to kelly love jamie ox 
you are a handsom man and i love u jox x x 
your are the man great shots bro jamie oxx  
thanks im over very soon cant wait to see the team joxx x 
shame bless you oh well you might be alright in the end 
check out these guys rowing 3000 miles 4 charity send them a message of support or even a small donation respect boys jox 
your doing amazing ushould have had a chef on board! get your asses home & well get you a proper feed be safe jamie oliver 
give her my love big kiss jo x 
thats completly what we try and do so glad you had a good time all the best jo 
so glad you had a great time we do try real hard thanks for tweet jox 
haha happy cooking 
Hey guys, if u have any questions about my #FoodRevolution browser app  Ask Guru they can help u out! 
Pinterest is great, I don't bloody understand understand it but I think it's great I think Deep Essex UK  
follow me and ill direct mail you short and sweet 
please get your facts straight joan i have offered loads of support thanks jo there just very rude people 
read your mail 
i have offered total support!! your incorrect they have been v rude and only want cash disgraceful 
thanks bro it was a good time working on a 2nd time jo 
work in progress bro 10 th year anniversary this year xx 
soon 3 or 4 months i recon 
thanks mate there is some great stuff in the pipe line jox x 
dont worry the british government took all that was found its ok not me im happy to just be in the restaurant now 
Thank you for your nice words, yep you are right it is up to all of us Jx 
wow! now that's a compliment babe J x 
big congrats to everyone who competed in the #BBshortrib comp on monday, ribs from looked great! jx #fb 
enjoy it u have a good man 
funny 
nice one laura respect 
cool go for it you know where to find me twitter aint the place 
no mate i was trying to be funny which im not have a good one 
its great andy there reviews arnt up to much 15's got a great menu at the moment 10th year anniversary this year go for it 
haha nah im not that brave, shoulder of lamb in the oven kids bathed should be a nice night , love to all jox 
happy valentines day2all the girls 2day thought Id mix it up this year 4 my wife just ordered a KFC bucket romance Isnt dead 
yeah thats true weve done a fantastic manchester play list 
cool well have a look go through my web site  
my approach? you mean stop feeding kids junk 180 days of the year from the age of 4 to 16 oh that approach cool jox 
Happy Valentine's Day everyone! hope you are cooking up something special tonight, let me know how you get on J xx 
good lad have a great one jox 
give him my love cook him a nice meal and give him a hug i haven't got any grandads so spoil him jox 
take away defo not cheaper 95% of the time !! who said romance is dead hay 
give her my love jox x x x 
haha ok great answer 
got a load mate and working on more have a good one 
gotta check the vaults there amazing when the bank moved out they found 1 million unclaimed £ and loads new order originals jox 
Good luck tomorrow boys valentines is a big day don't forget!! I just put some nice new recipes on  have a great day jox 
your new home in manchester is open this week bro welcome any time big love jox 
dont worry tom some times days are like that theres always another day you never know whats around the corner stay positive jamie 
Amazing! RT Big shout out to Thanks 4 supporting us, check out their #FoodRevolution banner  
sounds good mate, here is one of my lasagna recipes for you to try  hope it goes well! 
some of my favourite Valentine's Day recipes for you on the site  what's everyone cooking? #fb J x 
you are very funny young man very funny 
no 
respect respect its a great dish for the foodie well done joxx 
I thought long and hard and Ive decided I LOVE BRAZIL ! Mrs N's birthday party  
this is a great chicken dish for the weekend and really different with epic flavour big love jamie have a great one xx  
haha good stuff 
no 
thaks very much check out union jacks in holborn get a drink on me jox 
yes you can obviously they wont be as moist and juicy just make sure you heat them up good jo 
thanks very much all good here in the oliver house hold jox x 
well done its easy hay good stuff jox x 
Right guys, claim one of my spaces on #WaterForward and will get $10!  via 
Good luck to everyone competing in the #BBshortrib competition! Tweet your pics of the ribs for me to see 
Amazing building at new Jamie's italian in Manchester, opens in a few weeks very e King street manchester  
Pleased you like mate! 
Yeah! Check it out RT VIDEO about our #FoodRevolution FREE browser app!  #Fundraise4Free 
thanks for coming were really enjoying it jox 
just been its great 
have a great weekend guys here is a perfect cold weather recipe that i love lots of love jamie oxx  
Take a look guys. It will be massive! JO xx Keep an eye on RT - 's official trailer launches today at 4pm... 
good luck in london guys 
Lookin good! 
happy birthday darlin! Have a great day jo 
no worries mate 
Right #foodrevolution gang! Download our free browser app & help make a difference when u shop online.  Easy! #fb 
didn't say hallo how rude jox 
Dancing with passion This is how we roll in Essex Southend on sea  
cool bro your always welcome jo night mate 
bro im going there in manchester this week your always welcome man , thanks for filming its looking great !!! big love bro jo 
 
virgin yeay 
hay emeril hope your well all the best jamie 
ok you lot, it's time to ask me your food & cooking questions in make sure you include #askJamieO nice one Jx 
Check it out all the latest from the #foodrevolution RT Make sure you read this month's newsletter!  
Making a fabric out of potato prints of a salad of shaved beets crumbled goats cheese mint chilli olive Office  
You can sign our petition on #foodrevolution website & ask all your mates too  cheers! 
It's great to see! 
#foodrevolution gang, have you seen the final school lunch rules?  Big step! #schoollunch 
Have u downloaded the giving assistant 2 help my #foodrevolution yet?! Trip 2 London up for grabs!  #fb 
news for you all  Jx #fb 
Buddy starts to cook !! I Can't wait to get him cooking . He's such a sweet boy but wrecks the j Kitchen floor  
My good mate Dexter Fletchers movie Wild Bill is out 30th March, go Dex! great movie J x 
I just went on this ride it was amazing.last night tomorrow respect to the talented cast a Center point london  
View from Barbecoa ! Meat and fire St pauls the city  
Argentinian grill at Barbecoa meat and fire St pauls the city  
#FoodRevolution lot! Check out my giving assistant, a simple & easy solution 2 fundraising while u shop online!  jo 
might do im around if i see you ill give you a slap 
very soon 
good question i dont know 
cool 
i know its like watching a fire jox 
will have a look and check out cheers jox 
im at the dinner after 6 i think lots of italians 
nice one norman hope the new year has started go for you bro jox 
are you at the liberty wine do tonight ? 
your the man, hope your well bro come down and get a fed at union jacks jox 
hi olly hope your well bro jox 
hi babe hope your well joxx 
from the jamie does book ?beets vodka i love that so easy but most are scared off it you must be a proper cook bless u jox x x 
good luck whats in the fridge ? have a good one jox 
complain dude it should always be dressed i think they owe you a drink 
looks good bro jo 
some of my favourite comfort food recipes for you all, have a great weekend wherever you are  Jx #fb 
good luck! RT@jamieoliver_ed amazing story about Marc Noonan raising money for orphans, please give him your support  
Welcome to twitter great to see you on here! jo 
looks like it, sorry, tweet deleted..... 
thank you we work real hard on them thanks for your support jox 
thank you we work real hard on them thanks for your support jox 
love it joxxxx 
My Home Cooking Skills comp closes soon, some great prizes up for grabs!  Jx #fb 
morning guys Ive just put new recipes up 2day  
no dont !! 
woop woop thats a good one good fella you have 
bless you don't you worry its all good stuff that will serve u every day especially when u get to university love jamie ox 
wowzzers happy new year have fun with it all joxx 
yaaaay i love that one joxxx 
good on you enjoy jox 
ill be back later in the year but we've been running the ministry of food centre since ...its doing well jo 
thats funny 
its a load of rubbish i wouldnt take much notice jox x 
thanks very much i appreciate it .....it was a pleasure to write some amazing people i meet along the way , all the best jo 
New issue of is out. Has the best pudding my mum makes, and my top brunches. Love brunch  
My #foodrevolution chopped green salad is in January detox  check it out! #fb jox 
happy new year to you too! cheers for your support! jo 
hey darlin, there's loads on here  check them out & let me know what you go for! 
nice one, well done mate! jo 
good isn't it, you should take a pic and add here  cheers jo 
yeah pleased you enjoyed darlin! jox 
its a good one!! pleased you like jox 
Check out my everyday chopped green salad recipe in newsletter!  #foodrevolution #fb jox 
Nice one RT@jamieoliver_ed 4m Jamie’s American Road Trip premieres on January 3 at 10pm ET/PT on  #fb 
slowly fry chopped carrots & onions & coriander stalks 4 15mins add good! stock boil blitz season well add chopped coriander jox 
yeah thats filthy stuff stay away from it i say jox of dont buy squash there are some really nice cordials out there j 
bless the herald such a profound news paper , bless them its a quite time of year for news , anyway happy new year jox 
its sooooooo good i promise joxx 
A load of serious recipes gone up4the vegetarians amongst us or meat eaters wanting 2 mix it up this dish is a cracker  
i love it ! you say hubby doesn't cook and when he does he chooses the most expensive complicated dish genius jox 
if he can read he will be just fine if hes one of those dads that start improvising half way through who knows whatwill happen 
download instagram its a cool free app 
xxxxx good job jox x x 
feb bro cant wait 
HAPPY new year babe jox x 
Lotsa people asking 4 COMFORT food recipes today & empire roast chicken so Ive put a whole load on   
happy new year 2 all the team in Pitt St .....cant wait 2 see u around march big love keep up the great work jamie oliver X 
thats what i had for new years eve dinner its a cracker jo x 
did i spell it wrong sorry 
THANKS BRO thats why we do it hope you enjoy all the choice and packs jox 
just wanna wish you all a fantastic new year piece&love jamie ox Im doing a small 1 tonight made a nice pie some good wine & family sweet! 
andrew i have 17million followers i cant see every tweet i changeds fast im blessed to have seen u twice glad u liked the food !jo 
the manager there sweet hart good luck jox x x 
i guess thats a compliment 
i think i can infact i did and i recon i did a pritty good job jo 
it does work i dont even peel my garlic just put it in crush and go and remove the skin afterwords i use mine everyday 
of course the whole school approach is the only way jox 
thank you we try very hard to please jox 
thank u i hope they serve you well ! 
let me have a look again there are so many pastas and rissoto salads antipasti that either are vegetarian or could be ??? 
red whit wine vinegar cider vinegar Aspals vinegar's are great them spanish sherry vinegar balsamic of course try different onesjo 
joxx 
here's to a great rock and roll 2012 keep up the good fight!!! all the best from jamie oliver x x x 
get over it theres loads more crap out there for you to goorge on 
i dont think so it was a posh ice cream shop selling it at 14 pound a scoop !! crazy but true joxx 
there are always special cuts on and off menu put a call in and they will advise we have our own butchers so its easy to do joxx 
I struggle to eat breast milk ice-cream!
On the BIG FAT QUIZ OF THE YEAR tonight CHANNEL 4. 9pm
it was v funny, big love jamie ox 
left over recipes up take a look  
 joxx 
check this out THE FOOD REVOLUTION GOES ON, even your BIG MAC is gonna be better off its all about REAL food no TRICKS  
Our own honey from the roof tops of London above our test kitchens, Roof tops of test kitchen in Hoxten London  
nice one claire it is good get people every time jox 
hi mate i probably wont see you again on here as there are so many comments coming in but by luck i did see it hope u r well 
no i havent have you ever seen it being picked its the hardest farming ive seen 
five spice all over 3.5 hours at 170 C tender crispy delish good luck ( drain all the fat away and save it) 
thants funny i will thank her 
hi guys so its "boxing day" as us brits call it....so the battle of the left overs begins, which i love ! loadsa ideas@  
you'll be fine, keep enjoying it, keep it real food is medicine jox x x x 
cool there great well done jumx x x 
good man xxxjox 
haha i probably served them i remember too , endless chipping blanching and cricket players serving them all good times jox 
great job jox x x 
 
At my dads pub Loving the Xmas Eve seafood feast, proper french fries, salads, condiments wicke Dads pub essex  
My Turkeys gonna have a little swim in a light apple and thyme brine the a roast up in the am.....,, been Home  
Love this bro. X “@Tim_Burgess: You can download the Nativity poster by featuring ladyhawkeforyou
@gabegurnsey
@noelfielding11 
nice one tim. Great poster. X Jo xxx“@Tim_Burgess: #nowplaying Have Yourself A Merry Little Christmas bbc 6 music. 
no way 
right night night guys im off for an early night and get my silk p j's on ...to dream of a nice plump bird ....my turkey of course 
months jox 
im sure you'll be fine if you had two readings especially if you let it cool in the cooking liquid 
its quite nice toasted and rubbed with rosemary leave over night before blizzing up even better flavour have a try 
ditto bro 
love triffle 
no Ive just got them ready i Haven't prepped them i think i was over enthusiastic red wine talking 
blood has been an original thinking agent for a long time your the real deal sprinkle the cut with lemon and salt it really helps 
i feel you bro i love that bit to 
to be honest thats where im up to 
not much there still set up ill smash um in a few days for sure 
pancake 1 tea mug self raising flour 1tea mug of milk 1 happy egg pinch of salt small dessert spoons at a time in none stick pan 
firstly from a spoon just as it is, then a tiny fluffy pan cake tiny sour cream caviar chives drip of lemon champian 
if your nervous parboil and flavour tomorrow then roast to perfection while turkey rests 
good man it will be great let it chill in the fridge for 40 before you slice good luck jo x 
your on it well done 
yep read up on hes got it down ive got no space on twitter  
yes follow recipe to t and youll be sorted 
wow ok good luck 
a lot actually go to  
or your a day late 
sorry follow the recipe to the t i ment 
great follow to the t and youll be in a great place jox 
bless u im infront of fire red wine twiitering some love jox x x 
merry xmas jox 
yes no probs cook nicely tomorrow lay outside cool then one 25 bring back to life butter sage smoky bacon chestnuts yum joxx 
respect have a cracker 
yep in fridge freezer or a cool pantry is fine till Xmas boil & obviously add juices etc from turkey roasting so its unbelievable 
50% boiled pots and the rest what ever left overs you have butter season crisp up and mush up until it bubbles and squeaks jox 
cute good luck sisterly love is a beautiful thing jox 
correct i ment i had them im not gonna do anything with them till tomorrow or the big day jox 
respect joxxxxx 
dont talk to me about those bloody scallops or wehat ever you wanna call them dont worry ill get him back i know when and how 
cool it works tossing the spuds it your herbs and fat and seasoning as well works a treat have a good one joxx 
its all about planning mate i wanna br having fun on the big day good luck 
GOOD MAN THATS A GREAT thing to learn good luck thanks for coming i love Recipease the team are really good there jox 
how are you guys getting on ?? I've got get ahead xmas gravy done veg prep, shoping done Im all ready for tomorrow big love jox x x 
its because im shouting thats what its there for 
currently in shock from last message merry christmas everyone i think i better go have a whisky now to wash down the balls joxxxx 
I KNEW THERE WASNT SCALLOPS IN MALDEN BUT I WAS SO CURIOUS TO TRY THEM I JUST ATE 3 TURKEY STAG BALLS THATS WRONG MAN PAUL YOU WATCH OUT JOX 
GOT my beautiful turkey then owner paul kelly left me some malden Scallops which I ate.JUST FOUND OUT THEY WERE TURKEY BALLS!!! 
thanks mate thats so kind big love jox x x 
go to my web site babe its free 
Nice one! Jx #appstore named Jamie's Recipes iPad App of the Year on #Rewind2011!  
good man i cant spell anything poppy keeps me in check now days jo 
if its good fresh meat and you allowed all the elements to cool properly before mixing you can do it easily 2 days before joxx 
Hi Working with Chime.in to help charities. $1 will be donated when you register. Help choose the charity by voting:  
Working with Chime.in to help charities. $1 will be donated when you register. Help choose the charity by voting:  
Thanks for lovely messages about the show last night, get your xmas cooking questions answered on my site  Jx #fb 
my xmas with bells on part 2 is on tonight on C4 at 9pm, recipes on the site for you including jerky ham hocks  Jx #fb 
Meeeeeeerrry Xmas I'm on the home made slow gin and ice very nice very very nice signing out Planet SLOE GIN  
it was deadly 
dont bother mate just go with mine it make life easier 
so many of u guys are asking for the christmas special waffle & EPIC HOT Chocolate recipe so enough already here it is  
i love spain what a great country amazing food bless you all jox 
i didnt i just said i didnt like what was in them or more2the point what wasnt in them youll B ok there is a clinic that can help 
im a bit over brule but great ingredients cook in a water bath ,cook till still a little wobbly, custard 1 inch thick no more 
dont know i was to busy making gravy what happened i got my priorities confused 
you are brilliant well done oh and how good is it !!! so good 
you are a pro who ever employs you is very lucky indeed 
good lal great football team 
spinach nutmeg garlic butter cooked down dry and dark 
or roasted lightly spiced butter nut squash 
no mate not really into footy unless its world cup or Arsanal nothing is more important than gravy get your priorities right 
double this recipe minus the chicken &pot roast it with the leg of mutton go low & slow till it falls off the bone good luck 
one piece of smoked streaky bacon 
youy can be even better if you put your mind to it jox 
a week early or practise for the big day ? 
joe its twitter jo j is better than usingh up my full name whats the mater with you jamie oliver 
glad you enjoyed it olives are southern italian and are our little secret as they are sooooo good 
i like it with hot choc nice done at the table gets everyone going yum jox x x 
a1 student congrats joxx shining example to a stress free xmas 
snow machine 
its easy have a go at mine its tastier jox x x 
its a snow machien im dressed as santa ill change it soon dont worry 
me and mum jox 
ok get a quality slower growing bird they have more internal fat aka more moist use a thermometer, you could brine google that 
ok guys get ahead gravy is a massive massive xmas help for BIG day heres the recipe big love more to follow joxx  
on it thanks for heads up sent emails to all the right people there normally very fast jox x 
i like to think that makes all the difference good luck 
joxxx 
 
PLEASURE MATE have a good one 
GOOD MAN POST SHINS OF BEEF WHAT NEXT? 
hi guys A LOAD of new Christmas recipes on my web site Im really pleased with it, If your looking for reliable recipes  
loverly boy looks good jox 
yeah ill have a look im sort of keeping it italain but we have in all the other restaurants jo 
looks good were you pleased? joxx 
no live i do them once a month there fun we took calls and tweets live if it was pre recorded they would look more pollished 
good luck great job hard hard graft nice family amongst the head chefs good luck jo 
will do mate no one else has mentioned it but ill get one it thanks 
happy birthday good luck joxx 
Buddy's first Xmas tree I smell trouble anyone got a spare cage Tree land  
My 3 favourite boys Buddy Bear oliver, Deep Essex  
My Xmas card to you  
msg them on mate 
Check this out my #FoodRevolution gang! My new FREE app  download and #fundraise4free!#fb Jx 
not much so im looking forward to learning jox 
yes mate no probs extract is cool essence is a bit shity and synthetic 
only an idiot thanks for heads up jox 
nice one tiger, recipes here for you  #fb 
the xmas show would not be a show without bro, hope you enjoy it 
my xmas special, Jamie's Christmas with bells on airs tonight C4 at 9pm, it's a cracker! even if i do say so myself  #fb 
#recipeoftheday lovely mince pie cookies from #jamieschristmas  enjoy! Jx #fb 
you will enjoy it tiger, lots of fun! 
nice one bro, try the beef tagine recipe from Morocco, one of my favs 
hi there, some nice non alcoholic drinks on the site for you  #fb 
make mine red! RT@jamieoliver_ed 6 mins #jamieschristmas countdown tip for the day - have you ordered your wine?  #fb 
my buddy leigh haggerwood did the music on text santa download on  well done buddy 
just the beginning! RT Proof, why we need a #foodrevolution  
My buddy my long suffering food photographer just did a cool limite He's in San-fran Im In Es-sex  
Listen up my #foodrevolution gang, time 2 find out!! RT Do u kno what's 4 #schoollunch in ur schools?  
thanks tiger, glad you ,like it J x 
here you go....  Jx #fb 
#mincepieproject bid for Tony's mince pies, money goes to my Foundation and Action Against Hunger  #fb 
love it when the apprentices take on a challenge, check out our Tony raising money for my foundation  #fb 
will do sorry joxx 
if you know what is good for you wayne, you'll do what your told, pukka jo 
xxxxxxxxxxxxxjo thanks 
My mate David Loftus has just had his own lens created for Hipstamatic. How cool is that!?Joxxx 
amazon brother ill have a look 
place it in the fridge and wrap it up it will be fine 
Yes! Listen up guys RT NOW is the time to see what's really 4 #schoollunch  #foodrevolution 
#jamiesbiggive Please help my charity in the Big Give challenge and be in for a chance to win a meal at Barbecoa  Jx #fb 
my good mate Leigh Hagerwood's Christmas tune is now out, details here for you all  nice one Leigh! Jx #fb 
nice one tiger, some inspiration for you, loads of Christmas veg recipes from the festive site  Jx #fb 
#recipeoftheday is from #jamieschristmas - a bit of a mouthful but good wibbly wobbly clementine jelly  enjoy Jx #fb 
The coolest chairs ever in Union Jacks completely mad but goes with the music and St Giles highstreet Holborn  
Try the Old Spot Flat....it's the BOMB! Joxxx Union Jacks St Giles highstreet Holborn  
Try the Old spot flat is the Bomb!! Union Jacks St Giles highstreet Holborn  
At union jacks,Holborn-now open-show my staff this instagram and you can have a dr St Giles highstreet Holborn  
cabbage game jox 
sounds like the the tray is to big for the job it needs to be snug add a little water if you like joxx 
i know im such a geek but these are great, warm hands at last! jo x  
doesn't play babe 
feb babe jox 
hi guys, on  ive made live a whole christmas HELP HUB with loadsa recipes tips ideas & love take 5  
send me details bro i have an argo 4x4 ampib but this is super cool can you send to my web site please mate 
because she hasn't put loads of nitrates, salt-peter in it they use that in curing meats so you have pure stuff much better 
 
really !! thats very good for a 30 quid book jo 
Just finished this years christmas special, I'm really pleased with it!! Some really Tasty food and happiness  
where open now check out this A Day In The Life Of Restaurant -Union Jacks ...jamie liver and chris biaco

 
Happy cooking some new recipes, pic thanks to took pic Test Kitchen  
the world jox 
#saveourschoolfood check out our new Facebook page for you guys to connect on School Food issues in the UK  thank you Jx 
Aaron smashed it.Joxx RT@DropDownMenuTV: Coming up after the break we have winner of 's fifteen competition, 
Right then my #foodrevolution lot. Here's ALL the latest, including my holiday video message for you!  jxx #fb 
#recipeoftheday check out our lovely veg dishes for xmas including best-ever cranberry & pistachio nut roast  Jx #fb 
gnarly is great well done simple humble heven 
no way beetroot jelly sucks id rather die not my style there is a million things to do with beets before you make them to jelly 
thanks that makes me happy im over there tomorrow will pass on comments jo 
im sure your a great dad!! 
go easy on that stuff its a fantastic treat ....but a treat ..not hydration...bless jox 
no ive been there sounds like ice land to me jox 
dont understand what you mean sorry?? joxx 
looks great congrats bro joxx 
thanks man we try hard joxx 
dont have a 15 in kingston i have a jamies italian but portions are perfect unless they made a mistake but yes they do measure 
friday im there jox 
you only had to ask jox 
thank you bro we try very hard we love it fire and meat !!! jox 
Thanks all for your lovely comments on the series. Had a great time making in and learnt loads about our gorgeous country! Love Jo xxx 
Dec1 is World AIDS Day, get 1st access to &  Help make the beginning of #endofAIDS a reality #fb 
i looooooove real mexican food !! its amazing and i hope to go there to learn from the mums some time v soon big kiss joxx 
wow thats a good one 
im sure u guys r doing an amazing job there r many Arnt & if we allow the government to erode standards were in trouble good luck 
bless you welcome to the club 
not that ive herd 
that must be some damb good cheese on toast and it aint pizza it really is cheese on toast jox 
will do there are many but ill do a dedicated menu working on it 
fantastic joxxx 
i never said they will i said don't take away the nutritional standards that protect our kids.ive seen enough to have an opinion 
it burns smokeless surprisingly, carbon neutral they are great to cook on jox 
good job jo 
if its good stainless steal there all much of the same, carbon steal is best like the japanese cant buy in uk jox 
 
i put mine up my chimney inside bro bbq all year round 
feb babe cant wait great town /v small city were all up for it jox 
you conrole it like any other oven just its not as easy , you can maintain any temp but fire up and die down quick as well 
a few bro but better than butter all the time hay try cold pressed rape seed oil its very good 
thank you we try very hard 
hi big kiss j 
have a look  
put potatoes in it bro they will break up and thicken , rice can be good , flour not so nice , 
get the ones for kids not adults sister good luck 
xxxx 
smokeless fuel is district by district in london, my oven is carbon neutral as it burns so efficiently google wood fired ovens 
come to union jacks bro 
Sunday dinner in the wood oven,kids in bed so just me, good meat,red wine & mes hap Hot wood oven london town  
Happy 37th birthday jools hope you like the cake love jamie oxx Deep Essex  
gday and have a good one, cant wait to get out there jxx 
glad u like the xmassy recipes jx 
who doesnt ?? 
#jamieschristmas everything you ever wanted for christmas I have for you in one special place  enjoy! Jx #fb 
Good choice, go for it!! 
sure hope so! Enjoy! 
Happy #Thanksgiving to my US #FoodRevolution gang! Hope u all have a great day filled with good food! #fb jxx 
The coolest most inspiring Butcher- Don Dario Cecchini Panzano Chianti Italy  
Best butchers shop in Tuscany Panzano  
Thanks for your support! Pleased you like! 
My favourite Tuscan wine if you wanna see it being made through out the year follow my friend Luka and he will te  
Arrosto misto toscono! Tuscany  
My favourite Tuscan ballsy wine the amazing Luka Tuscany  
you got it right, C4 at 9pm RT@KateChatterton Oooh Bristol tonight. Can't wait to see Roj Wilkins Jx #fb 
Spent a few days with my mate he’s created a new xmas Sausage, chestnuts and cranberries – awesome, have put my order in! Jx #fb 
Guys This is my mentor a very special person and amazing chef please follow him as he is getting old and needs th  
id love to help out if i can go through enquires at  jox 
happy birthday babe jox x x 
i hope you think this is thought provoking have a listen to something i did earlier this month love jamie ox  
#recipeoftheday has to be Highland mussels from tomorrow night's episode of Jamie's Great Britain  nice one! Jx #fb 
nice one Thanks for all your help in making the show Shelia, hope you in the pink! Jx  
Thanks for all your help in making the show Shelia, hope you in the pink! Jx  
Misty, cold morning-kinda stunning perfect for a nice hot breakfast Deep Essex  
Nice one! You can add it at  
Have u txt yet?! RT tell congress to protect kids not pizza! Txt 'JAMIE' to 90975  #foodrevolution 
Help I've shrunk !!!! But at least be got my new kids food revolution apron BA lounge  
thanks for your support mate! 
text congress to tell them to put the kids first not pizzas! It's all on here  #foodrevolution 
With u there! Text 2 tell congress  RT Couldn't be more shocked/disgusted: #foodrevolution 
Pizza is not a vegetable. w@jimmykimmel Tell Congress kids deserve better. #schoollunch TXT "JAMIE" to 90975  
ofcourse you know us i suggest you watch its gonna be great 
not yet ive been away but i got the last one thank you very sweet hope you r well all the best jox 
Going on Jimmy kimmel live tonight , looking forward to it, he's a top man & i recon he's the best proper cook in hollywood he's really good 
Love the #foodrevolution gang! RT Some of our community views on pizza & potato politics  #schoollunch 
my favourite meal of the year this Canadian is a humble genius such integrit Buca Restaurant Toronto  
UNREAL, why we need a #foodrevolution RT Congress blocks new lunch rules & pizza counts as a veg  
As I am here - to all my US lot, my good Leigh Hagerwood's xmas tune is released on the 5th Dec, more info here  Jx #fb 
Mrs piggy did not approve of me cooking sausages, I told her it was bangers and mash Regis & Kelly NYC  
Love NYC......Good thing about jet lag is 5 am walks in the city which I love!!!. Toron Empire State building  
hi darlin hear the art project is going well? on board. Well done girl jx 
For my UK lot back home, tune into C4 at 9 tonight, I am off cooking in the heart of the country! Jamie's Great Britain Jx #fb 
Thanks! RT@Java2UCoffee Awesome recipe Jai !! RT Hey my US gang. I'll be cooking on at 8:36 #mealsinminutes Jx #fb 
Hey my US gang. I'll be cooking on at 8:36 #mealsinminutes Jx #fb 
Chek out one of the recipes from tonight's episode of Jamie's Great Britain it's a cracker! Empire roast chicken  Jx #fb 
To my US lot, my new TV show, Meals in Minutes is available exclusively on iTunes  Jx #fb 
your dad is a clever man 
ok ok 
funny reply jox tell them they owe you a drink on me jox 
book where ?  hit restaurants details there 
ooppps sorry ....weve all done it shame 
summer to winter its still around it may be farmers markets for best stuff jox 
congrats and thank u for coming bless u joxx 
good man so pleased your happy 
fantastic 
my boggs i love boggs thomas crapers everytime 
always thank u very kind of you twice i believe all the best jamie ox 
opps hope your ok 
so pleased cheers !! 
you must be a friend or family of our crew were not open yet bless u glad u enjoyed it joxx 
#FoodRevolution army - you rock! We are now over 770,000 BIG thanks to you all!  #fb jxx 
why what was I wearing? 
enjoy it mate! 
Happy birthday darlin! 
YEAH! Join the revolution ppl!! RT Only 56 ppl to go until we reach 770,000!! Join the #foodrevolution  
11/11/11 
 cheeky stuff at #UnionJacks last nite. Opens next week can't wait 4 u to try it!! Jx 
cant beat the burger ....legendary RT just taken my GF to Birmingh… (cont)  
U forgot Gennaro.. RT So far all we can figure out about last night's fundraise… (cont)  
 me and Gennaro 'sexbomb' Contaldo getting ready for tonight. Big luv to great people jxx 
Legends RT End of a great night for and the legend that is the hair is real! pic.twitter.com/lYzg4eop 
cool x RT@iewalker I cannot go past jamie's fish pie. And everyone always goes back for thirds-yes, thirds. #JamieHomecook 
I've just added a load of my mates to WaterForward, a movement to end the water crisis  Check it out!! jxx 
Good luck pj. Love JO xxx tonight BBC2 9pm #howwemadeourmillions  
What a cracking nite at #UnionJacks !! Can't wait to open the doors to u lot  jxo 
WOW!! RT quality tonight mate!my kids have offered pocket money to pay for ingredients for me to make arctic roll! 
GET INVOLVD RT Not long until tonight's #FoodRevPARTY GUEST HOST Join 7pmPST for some #FoodRevolution convo! 
im hoping everyone tries sum rabbit 
thank u mate RT making beef n beer stew tonight.thanks 4 getting me back into cooking again! 
HAHA! RT Arctic Roll... I've not seen my wife this excited for quite some time Mr Oliver!!! 
All the recipes from #jamiesgreatbritain are here  so glad u like the show jxx 
thanx darlin xx 
Hahaa. Glad u like it 
All the recipes from #jamiesgreatbritain are here  enjoy jxxx 
Thanks for all the nice messages #jamiesgreatbritain 
naughty !! 
me too!! #jamiesGreatBritain 
Luv the sky plus 
Getting ready for #JamiesGreatBritain on c4 at 9pm 
Home made Ice cream at Union Jacks..... St Giles highstreet Holborn  
Chris Bianco my partner in the oven beat flats ever!! St Giles highstreet Holborn  
Day one at Union Jacks all the crew are happy and the music rocks menu to follow St Giles highstreet Holborn  
O yeh! Keep 'em coming!! RT Uploaded ur #schoollunch?  we want 2 c whats on the tray! #foodrevolution 
#JamiesGreatBritain tonight 9pm c4 lets see what wales has got for us ay!!!  
top man, safe trip back home, and send my love to if you see him!! 
To all my Canadian lot, I'll be visiting Toronto Nov 16 and doing a little chat for you all, get tickets here:  Jx #fb 
Thank you Hamburg thank you Tim Maltzer good times....jamie zx Hamburg  
Air streem in Germany Hamburg  
US guys!! RT It's #foodrevolution Milk Wk of Action!  R u getting involved? #flavoredmilk 
THANX RT Me and just enjoyed a primary school dinner. Got to say they've vastly improved. Thank you 
thanks mate 
looks good m8! 
Right then my #foodrevolution army - here's all the latest news 4 u  sloppy joes & milk action! jx #fb 
happy birthday darlin! 
nice one JxRT@JamiesItalianUK Why not book our fantastic #Christmas menu available in all our sites from  
US gang! RT Nov 7-11 - #foodrevolution Milk Week of Action! Get facts, join forces, talk 2school!  
Oh yeh it's a revolution! RT There's a #FoodRevolution going on throughout the country!  
#recipeoftheday lovely Leigh on sea sole from my new book Jamie's Great Britain  enjoy! Jx #fb 
ahh that's nice but I'm taken love 
looking good darlin 
thank uuuu hope u like it jx 
which one mate? 
nice one send us a photo mate 
Sexy london lunch “@Barbecoa_london market stall down at One New Change today.get some beautiful pulled pork!!!  
Thank you for the lovely comments on last night's show, really chuffed, check out comp to win a Yorkshire treat  Jx #fb 
believe me bro, it tasted as good as it looked 
nice one guys. JOxx“@themidnightbell: Very excited about our appearance on tonights Jamies Britain. #JamiesBritain” 
Nice one! the pie looks tasty 
settled in for a night in front of the tele? my show on Great Britain in 20 mins, C4 at 9pm 
Jamie's Great Britain ep 2 is on tonight on C4 at 9pm, check out video of me making Roast Steak to get you in the mood  
#recipeoftheday It's all about Yorkshire tonight on Jamie's Great Britain check out my recipe for baby yorkshire puds  
Amazing, that's what it's all about darlin! Share your story here  
Love it, amazing mate! 
pleased you liked! thanks babe 
oh yeh! 
Over 22,000 votes so far - KEEP RATING PPL!  #bestworstlunch #foodrevolution 
#recipeoftheday some lovely new recipes from my Great Britain show, check out Guinness lamb shank, yum!  Jx #fb 
I love a badge!! Union Jacks opens soon!! Office london  
ask away! RT@JamieMagazine Ask your food and cooking questions & he'll answer the best ones in his mag! Include #askJamieO 
xxx yep there goooood jo 
pick the leaves of the sprigs babe 
it means black cabbage i always call it cavolo nero as do the italians jo 
to taste just a splash 
nice bro 
chilling out watching piers morgan and i gotta say i love james Corden what a brilliant british talent and a magic fella jox 
good man well done you should come to Barbecoa and check out my partner adam perry lang he's the don of meat bro jo 
big love going out to all the jamie's italian ausi team xxx keep up the great work, big love jamie oxxx 
try 'rice and things" in Bristol 
hahah brilliant respect !!jox 
both 
internet babe easy 
please let us know on  bro always looking at schools good and bad 
OK SMARTY pants there not available in supermarkets, there not something average joe knows about , distribution NOT GOOD !! 
WHAT ACCT 
OR DRIED OR FROZEN OR IN OIL OR POUND UP IN SALT 
EMPIRE CHICKEN 
THANKS MATE WE TRY VERY HARD 
thats ok it can be a beautiful babe! good cheese ham i just bought a Brevel again so i can burn my mouth with a volcanic toasty jox 
unless they have been naughty!!! one has to find creative ways to reprimand them these days !!joke..Daily mail would love that jo 
yes 
no nothing like it jane get on the internet girl stop making excuses pimp your curry 
word up 
you would love morocco then you must go wicked grub and cheep to get to from uk 
thats why u use the internet for hard to get stuff well worth it even i do it the world is a very small place now joxx 
you can order bulbs online haver a search plant now if in uk 
wooop wooop you the man you know the score dont forget the chilli 
SISTER U R missing out! indian food is some of the most incredibly diverse tasty regional food in the world ! try the real deal 
fare play good with beer to Angalo french italian meal all you have to do is eat it with chop sticks and your doing a 4 way jox 
dried curry leaves get them on the internet fresh or dried well worth it 
a great meal especially by the sea jox 
hes in italy at the moment cooking at a nudist colony , very funny 
sweet 
GREAT IDEA IVE never tried that will do now nice one mc hammer 
XXJO 
we do that in the uk its basic stuff fairly useful, sign posting food is great only IF people R educated jox 
hey Garry you the man keep cooking bro! jamieox 
heres 2 the weekend guys, friday night curry was Delish! secret ingredient that makes a difference CURRY LEAVES respect to the Indian cooks 
See school lunches around the world  and help the #FoodRevolution find the #bestworstlunch! 
unwind bro good luck get the woke hot hot hot 
garlic breat is french bro but we have garlic foccachia even though i cant spell it forgive me i can just bake it 
depends how you like it cooked but it sounds great 
hi jamie you the man!!! keep cooking jox 
no sorry just gossip jo 
will defo do perth just gonna let the team settle so happy to be in ausi jox 
Big shout out to all of the gang you guys ROCK! Have heard great stories about the opening, well done to everyone J x 
Lovely day today, hope ppl can get out & enjoy it! jxx 
good luck darling, it's a good one! 
following now babe! 
Loving the neon rain deer antlers I guess it's getting towards that time of year Front room floor  
Buddy at 1 year old I think I might be the dad!! Dead ringer or what Essex  
Me at 1 year old Essex  
#teamMellor COME ON PAY UP BOYS JOX 
HI SORRY IM ON AND OFF SO QUICK I NEVER GET TO SEE MOST STUFF JO X 
glad you guys enjoyed the show tonight nice to do something about home for a change ..night night and as they say in ESSEX REEEM!! BLESS JO 
good eyes yeah i was getting it polished ! only once every few years but you dont miss a trick sister ! back on now joxx 
just point to your calf muscle and say mooooooo ! the spaish will get it they cook goooood joxxx 
Thanks for all the lovely mesages check out recipes at www.jamieoliver.com #JamiesGreatBritain jxx 
Check out Tiger!! 
Ha ha RT two words: fit pie 
U are right it was mate RT That pie was amazing. #JamiesGreatBritain 
U guys love the cock in cider don't you!! #JamiesGreatBritain haha 
Those bloody Mary oysters are SO good 
Gettin ready c4 now jxx 
my new show Jamie's Great Britain airs on C4 tonight at 9pm, as an Essex lad I love this one! chek out my interview  #fb 
Keep 'em comin! RT Over 8000 votes! Have u rated lunches from across th world?  #foodrevolution 
I second that! RT@jamieoliver_ed Thanks to everyone at for a lovely night last night, really great food from Bruno Loubet 
hi babe were still having good dialogue and the new super is way better lets see what can happen in the next year jox 
happy birthday lucy have a great one big kiss jamie ox 
My Buddy smashin pumpkins ! Pile of squash in Essex UK planet Earth  
Hi guys i think this is a Cool web site if you keep dropping your phone like me then these are qui Deep Essex  
If your around london check this Instagrame show out loads of great w East gallery 214 brick lane london E16SA  
Good luck to my gang down in sydney. U guys are gonna love it JO x We are excited about officially opening this Monday! 
just went thru the Best and Worst school lunch and rated the lot. U wont BELIEVE the photos  
Amazing Sun rise in Essex 7am Deep Essex  
#FoodRevolution gang! Pizza, salads & #bestworstlunch photo wall - all the latest from  #fb 
donexx 
quality fish oils and a varied mixed balanced diet plenty fresh veg quality proteins and portion control loadsa water joxxxx 
xxx 
GOOD LUCK move it around evenly sister surf and turf it 
sister you know as well i as i do it has to be a 
 steak and cheese pie bro choooice!! bro from New Zealand jo 
morning everyone! hope your all well... gonna put up some great comfort food recipes up today for you check out on jamieoliver.comxx.. 
WISH HER HAPPY BIRTHDAY BABE JAMIE OLIVER XXXX 
ive writen for many people over the years my friend from ladys mags GQ News of the world its the readers im passionate about jo 
thanks babe we try really hard truy the new pulled pork and tell them to buy you a drink on me jamie x 
My mate Dexter Fletcher's first new film at the London film festival tomorrow at leicester squar Office london  
Christmas!!! JO xxx  
#recipeoftheday a bit of a treat today - toffee apple tart  enjoy! Jx #fb 
cant wait for mine to do the same 
luv it 
Check it out, my lovely magazine team have an offer on to get a free copy of my book Jamie's Great Britain  #fb 
#recipeoftheday some recipes from my new book Jamie's Great Britain, here's one of my favs, Will and Kate's wedding pie  
her teacher has no idea what there saying if she wants2be a chef she should go for it , its a great industry get out what u put in 
That's wild deer about 400 yards away not bad quality for an I phone it's amazing really!! New one Deep Essex  
Amazing sunrise at 7:40am today filled the house with golden light just the best alarm clock in th Deep Essex  
Good morning everyone what a beautiful day good luck wales in the Rugby do it like a Wednesday night in Swansea BIG love jamie oxx 
love the scooting 
not true guys 
delete it and re download it sharon any other probs contact zolmo which you can click through on itunes 
feb cant wait jox 
Amazing!! We've just reached 100,000 supporters on #FoodRevolution community fb page!  #fb 
US #FoodRevolution Gang! It's 'Take Your Parents to Lunch Day' Eat school, snap a pic & upload:  #schoollunch 
well get you into sydney restaurant babe no sweet jo 
hi babe jefro says your a big fan good person great cook and enjoy cooking in the buff every day bless you for that top girl 
Yeah! RT Mrs Q is hosting our #foodrevparty TONIGHT! Join 7pmPST/10EDT  #foodrevolution 
US gang - get cooking! My new book Meals in Minutes makes it easy, more info:  and check back! #jomealsinminutes Jx #fb 
Look at the old ceiling in my new restaurant at thred neddle stree Jamies italian thread needle street london  
#recipeoftheday lovely butternut squash muffins with a frosty top  enjoy Jx #fb 
morning! check out a recent interview I did with my mate for bit.ly/pAQ2ia Jx #fb 
My 4 girls love them all so much..... Mini railway  
dont open the oven door dont take the batter to thick im doing one now!! good luck 
just say i said you can have a table, be flexible with time and youll be cool ask to speak to manager and they can ask me jox 
Hi guys Im on Jonathan Ross ITV 10PM tonight with Lady Gaga and Lee Evans all im gonna say is i cook her meat dress and it tasted goooood JO 
Listen up guys! Nxt wk-Nat'l School Lunch Wk! Eat school,snap a pic,start th convo!  #schoollunch #foodrevolution #fb 
im writing a breakfast menu its looking good anything i must not forget ?>? jamie o 
Check out these inspiring words from Steve Jobs you should have a look jamie ox North london  
Rest in piece you clever clever man Office london  
This is BIG RT Anonymous SCHOOL LUNCH BLOGGER REVEALS IDENTITY (cont)  
Lunch yum Office london  
#recipeoftheday early autumn minestrone (minestrone d'inizio autunno)
 enjoy! Jx #fb 
Can't Believe my magazine is now in Russia !!! Very cool Office london  
ask away! RT@JamieMagazine Want to answer your questions in the magazine? He might.... Ask away, including #askjamie 
what a great morning have a great one guys!! if you need bbq recipes ive put a load of new ones up big love jamie 
 
xx 
hi babe hope your wel darling your doing a great job take care jox 
bless you they are for kids but glad you enjoyed 
for all of you in the UK this weekend - get outside and get cooking! some of my bbq recipes for you  enjoy Jx #fb 
check out some of my absolute all time favourite recipes in my latest book - Jamie's Great Britain  Jx #fb 
My lovely British issue is out w amazing food! UK readers subscribe now & get a free copy of my new book  
cooking at mission control Central Essex near faces night club  
so tweeps........talk to me 
wish I could be there mate, such a great gathering. Good luck j 
#recipeoftheday an oldie but a goodie, simple roast chicken is on the menu today  enjoy! Jx #fb 
Very proud of my mate Dex very proud to have a super shiny plaque from SanSebastian with Wild Bill written on it 
Latest from my #UNSummit #NCDs update & 'Whats really for school lunch'?!  #foodrevolution jox 
Hi guys. Check out my brand new food guide app. Full of great places for food all over Britain. JO xxx
 
#recipeoftheday it's a classic - blackberry and apple pie  enjoy! Jx #fb 
glad you like them jox 
Who's in?! RT Will you be joining the #foodrevPARTY tonight w/@WoollySchools? 4pmPDT/7pmEDT #foodrevolution 
Who's in?! RT Will you be joining the #foodrevPARTY tonight w/@WoollySchools? 4pmPDT/7pmEDT #foodrevolution 
Keep em coming.Thanks for last lot. RT We want to hear about your Christmas kitchen calamities. Send to christmas2011@freshone.tv 
Love it. Nice one babyface. X 
The #UNSummit is still happenin in NY. Make a stand for YOUR COUNTRY against #NCDs #globalobesity  #foodrevolution 
Love this! RT My 8 year old told me no more chocolate milk cause "Jamie Oliver wouldn't approve!" #FoodRevolution 
Yes! Support #UNSummit on #NCDs RT Pics frm YOUTH RALLY this morn. Huge energy, passion #foodrevolution ow.ly/1xlcr4 #socialgood 
Time 4 a #foodrevolution! RT US health care cost is 42% more if you are obese. #UNSummit on #NCDs  
#recipeoftheday why not give this dish a whirl - 1 steak / 2 sauces  enjoy! Jx #fb 
Probably the biggest ever black truffle sent in the post look at the size Deepest Essex ! Just like Tuscany!!!  
Guys, only 2 days til #UNSummit on #NCDs, pls pls watch the video (on my #foodrevolution homepage) & act now!  
Me don Kevin boss of instergram and Johnathan Waxman aka yoda of food!!! Lucky me Sweetings london  
have fun babe!!! say a big hi to the gang and to hostess!! and a kiss to my consultant they work hard joxxx 
Happy 1st birthday baby Buddy good boy  
sorry,it works for us & keeps the price for the customers down theres lots of choice out there we only use them if were ramo 
PLS WATCH & ACT NOW! RT See URGENT message on the #UNSummit on #NCDs  #foodrevolution 
def let know 
STAND UP FOR YOUR COUNTRY! Non Communicable Diseases (#NCDs) cause #36million deaths globally.SIGN the petition bit.ly/e3n2Ro 
Non Communicable Diseases (#NCDs) cause #36million deaths globally.SIGN the petition  DO YOUR PART TODAY!! 
cant believe that im heading towards 1,500,000 followers thats mad thanks for all your support where ever you live in the world jamie oxx 
ill try again sorry this place is well worth a visit 
www.arnoldandhenderson.com/4-18-rochelle_canteen.html 
thanks babe im there tomorrow to see team take care 
i had truly amazing great value food this lunch Rochelle canteen have a look ttp://www.arnoldandhenderson.com/4-18-rochelle_canteen.html 
THANK YOU!!!  Finally signed #foodrevolution petition :) 
Im trying signed the #FoodRevolution petition? bit.ly/e3n2Ro #NCDs #asktheSG #UNSummit RT (cont)  
THANKS BAHRAIN signed the #FoodRevolution petition? bit.ly/e3n2Ro #NCDs #asktheSG #UNSummit RT (cont)  
Have YOU stood up for your country & signed the #FoodRevolution petition?  #NCDs #asktheSG #UNSummit 
Thanks UN Sec Gen 4 answering! #asktheSG We need a lifestyle change, join the #FoodRevolution!  
2.8mil ppl die each yr as a result of obesity & being overweight, how can you help us reverse this? #asktheSG #foodrevolution 
Revolutionaries- stand up 4 ur country! Ask ur questions to the Sec Gen on obesity & #NCDs by using hash tag #asktheSG! #foodrevolution 
The real cost of obesity is our health and lives, will u help us increase education & prevention across the globe? #asktheSG #foodrevolution 
Over 35mil ppl die of #NCDs every year which accounts for 60% of all global deaths, how can we reduce this? #asktheSG #FoodRevolution 
UN SecGen:Hold world leaders accountable for outcomes of #UNSummit on #NCDs! #save36millionlives #asktheSG #FoodRevolution PLS RT 
Nice one gang!JOx RT@FreshOneTV Very excited about Fresh One's new entertainment show #Showboaters starting tonight 8pm on Sky One. 
#recipeoftheday check out my recipe for scrummy warm rocket salad bit.ly/bNxGzl enjoy! Jx #fb 
#recipeoftheday check out my recipe for scrummy warm rocket salad  enjpy! Jx #fb 
YES RT ps. - Barbecoas at One New Change is Fantasmagorical!!!!! :-) 
whats going on tweeple? 
Non Communicable Diseases (#NCDs) cause more deaths globally than all other causes combined #UNSummit #save36millionlives 
none babe news paper kindling loggs / coal but normally wood.....fire lighters tend to make the food taste not so good 
Rainbow at festival Jimmys farm  
#NCDs Genuinely concerned that when urgent action MUST be a priority,this #UNsummit draft declaration doesn’… (cont)  
I’m genuinely concerned that at a time when urgent action MUST be a priority, this #UNsummit draft declaratio… (cont)  
LUV THEM RT Perhaps a little blurry on the photography but I got a bit excited. Here’s a pi… (cont)  
#recipe of the day Candied Bacon Green Salad  get involved!  #recipes #fb 
happy birthday darlin, whats cookin today? or are they cookin for u??? hope so jxo 
REMEMBER RT Don't forget...kids eat free this lunch time in our Kingston, Guildford and Reading restaurants :@) x 
Hot off the press #FoodRevolution update,  Fantastic fruit salad AND info on #OYW and 
check out these beauties Navajo flatbreadsssss  so good it hurts!! jx #recipe #fb 
yum yum RT gnam gnam 
good for u girl 
for THE most up to date info on the global #FoodRevolution U should follow jxo 
FOllowing U RT@7Mrsjames I signed last week- can u say hi to yr 7 Oakhill college students & will all sign in class :) over 60 kids 
#recipeoftheday simple, simple, simple - herb salad with goat's cheese  enjoy! Jx #fb 
SO GRATEFUL for all the countries signing this petition bit.ly/e3n2Ro U ARE AMAZING! Sign and RT #FoodRevolution 
#FoodRevolution COOL countries signing the petition, check out the flags bit.ly/e3n2Ro IS YOUR COUNTRY THERE? jxx 
ok will repost in a min 
#FoodRevolution Es tiempo de cambiar la alimentación, detener la obesidad, firmen esta petición mundial por favor! bit.ly/e3n2Ro 
#FoodRevolution So many cool countries signing the petition, check out the flags bit.ly/e3n2Ro IS YOUR COUNTRY THERE? jxx 
stil trying to follow evryone, so difficult the screen keeps jumpin 
So many cool countries signing the petition, check out the flags bit.ly/e3n2Ro IS YOUR COUNTRY THERE? jxx 
YES MAURITIUS!! following u bit.ly/e3n2Ro SIGN & RT I signed for Mauritius! :) 
This is AMAZING, so many countries signing this petition bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT I signed for Panama. 
BIG UP THE CYMRU!!! sign and RT bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT Signed for Cymru 
LOVE TO CANADA!!! SIGN HERE bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT I signed for Manitoba, Canada :) #FoodRevolution 
ITs for the whole world mate, obesity is a global health issue bit.ly/e3n2Ro 
THANKS HK, followin u bit.ly/e3n2Ro SIGN AND RT I've signed for HONG KONG ^_^ !!!!!!!! 
THANKS RT I just signed the #FoodRevolution Petition! Sign & watch AMAZING supporter's vid  
HI KUWAIT following u RT hi I'm from Kuwait just singed the #FoodRevolution petition pls follow me ;) 
WAHEYYY hi Irish jx RT I signed for Ireland! 
Still trying to follow everyone that is signing the petition bit.ly/e3n2Ro #FoodRevolution 
HI MY NZ gang! bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT I've signed for New Zealand! :D 
Hi Lebanon gang! THanks bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT Lebanon signed :D 
Thanks for signing im folowin u bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT Greece signed!! 
HI LITHUANIA! thank u bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT Lithuania signed! 
Thanks the Netherlands! RT The Netherlands, check!! RT So many countries signin… (cont)  
Followed! bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT Signed! 
THANKS TO everyone whose signing and RTing Im trying to folllow all of you, its not easy 
GO MALAYSIA bit.ly/e3n2Ro RT signed the petition! keep up the good work jamie! love from malaysia :) 
done mate 
So many cool countries signing the petition, check out the flags  IS YOUR COUNTRY THERE? jxx 
hello mate 
Followin u RT everyone one needs to sign we really need to evoke a positive change in our fo… (cont)  
DONE RT can you follow me too and ill get all my twit and facebook friend to sign 
THX DARLIN RT signed the petition, keep up the good work. Recommend everyone get involved -  
Anything for the #FoodRevolution RT follow me and I'll make my entire family to sign your petition ;) 
Jobs with me are here mate  RT Hello chap, any jobs going? Il… (cont)  
Following you now babe RT Hey MrO if you follow me I'll get all my FB friends t… (cont)  
THANK U RT Be the change you want to see in the world. Join the #FoodRevolution & sign this →  
THANKS for signing RT I've just added my name to the #FoodRevolution, watch EXCLUSIVE video & he… (cont)  
check out the new graffiti LUV IT SO MUCH!  
hiya darlin 
hes a hero RT Dunno how D Walliams can even contemplate #thamesswim, tho it's for a wonderful cause 
it should be ill double check it has been in? 
good to know thanks 
UP for your country's health  #FoodRevolution I signed & challenge fellow South Africans 2 do it! 
have you SEEN all of the countries that are signing this???? CRAZY  joxx 
Thank u and HELLOOoo serbia RT Signed!  Greetings from Serbia! I hope it helps! 
GREAT RT I just signed the #FoodRevolution Petition! Sign & watch AMAZING supporter's vid  
u say that all the tiime and we talk all the time, how are u mate? 
THX MATE followin uRT Go Jamie! MT STAND UP for your country's health  #FoodRevolution #OYW 
THXfollwin u too RT Viva la Food Revolution! Have you signed the petition? #foodrevteam  
THank U following u RT Just signed the #FoodRevolution petition!!! :) and I'm hoping every South African will!! 
THANKS im following u RT i've just signed the #FoodRevolution petition  #uk 
NICE ONE me too RT I signed the #foodrevolution petition when it wasn't cool! 
yep 
oh come on mate 
THANKS FOR SIGNING RT I just signed the petition for FOOD REVOLUTION  
YEAH!!! thanks for signing! RT I just signed Food Revolution Petition.  
RT Just about to eat at Italian in Birmingham. All the food coming out looks so yummy! 
have u seen this...  Brilliant Burger review 
STAND UP for your country's health  #FoodRevolution #OYW 
looks GREAT! 
“ calls for global action to tackle #obesity | Life and style | The Observer  #FoodRevolution 
“@RobertoAPadron: RT Edmonton, Canada public schools go junk food free  
#foodrevolution” 
“@EpicMealTime: YO!! is the man!!! #HatersGonHate” luv these guys 
looks like end of summer , kids back at school , dark by 8pm , leaves falling off the trees ......good job i like the 4 seasons 
not sure about that babe you need to you tube "the only way is essex" taking the country by storm. so jokes wont be going soon 
well done 
glad you liked it were really happy to be there jox 
buy a book and get of twitter then geek 
hi cousin 
i had the pleasure 2 met the Norwegian prince & princess this week at one young world ! prince did an amazing speech what a loverly couple!! 
thank you we do try bless you hope to see you again soon 
depends how big they are not most the time unles they are massive or old and woodyer parboil 8 mins then roast 
looks good bro id buy just thighs or whole leg and thighs if it tastes good it is good 
Chek out all the flags from different countries  over 750,000 have taken a stand for their country! WILL YOU? 
MAKE A DIFFERENCE TODAY! SIGN petition & watch new video with #JenAniston, #EltonJohn & #RobertDowneyJnr  
“@VivaVoceBavaria: how can we support you?” u can sign petition mate MAKE A DIFFERENCE TODAY!  
keep up the good work and send me photos jxx 
Great article  
MAKE A DIFFERENCE TODAY! SIGN petition & watch new video with #JenAniston, #EltonJohn & #RobertDowneyJnr  
sounds fantastico!!! joxxx 
thanks for passing on love canada im over in november 
great idea bro give me a year 
january babe 
amazing stat babe thank u 
fennel in bass, a little (clean seawater...old school works!!) make home made garlic aioli ..fish heads 
big love to all the one young world delegates, it was a pleasure to meet you.
safe journey home good luck in all you do....jamie oliverx 
hit the anti pasti planks and get a load of small pastas there epic 
#LA MAKE A DIFFERENCE TODAY! SIGN petition & watch new video with #JenAniston, #EltonJohn & #RobertDowneyJnr  
thanks make sure you speak to the manager hell sort 
MAKE A DIFFERENCE TODAY! SIGN petition & watch new video with #JenAniston, #EltonJohn & #RobertDowneyJnr  
GO for it #oyw !!! Let's see how many you guys can get by end of conference!  tell your friends! Jxx 
morning guys here's a nice little lunch number for you have a good one ..jox
 
of course its nice to see where everyone comes from helps me work out what recipes to send out 
one young world web site 
Yes my #LA gang SIGN and watch new video with Jen Aniston, Elton John & Robert Downey Jnr  
thanks guys you are legends. If all of your followers signed it would make a difference. X  
SIGN and watch new video with Jen Aniston, Elton John & Robert Downey Jnr  
where you you come from?? im from essex england love jamie ox 
how was it babe ? 
ill have a look sorry man 
come on big boy. its only just opened ..never ever go to a new restaurant the first week its open!! its always crazy bro !! 
Check out my NEW #foodrevolution petition page guys! Sign it to see your name on the site!  #OYW 
YEAH! RT Have u seen our NEW petition sign up & EXCLUSIVE celeb video? Sign up now!  #FoodRevolution #OYW 
Massive thanks 2 all who have signed! If u haven't then check out NEW petition page & CELEB vid!  #foodrevolution #OYW 
Me and my hero Desmond Tutu at one young world #FoodRevolution Zurich switzland  
helo!  RT students meet #oyw conference in Zurich! #foodrevolution 
WE ARE TRENDING PEOPLE yes!!!!! SIGN and see your name on my website  #FoodRevolution 
LOVE seeing all the flags from different people's countries that are signing the GLOBAL petition  
LOVE seeing the flags from diff people's countries that are signing GLOBAL petition  
amazing news!! “@ma_nzi: exactly when its lunch. touche. RT Jamie Oliver, is now trending in South Africa” 
THANKS DARLIN RT After a very inspirational speech from make sure you sign his #Fo… (cont)  
LUV U RT I just signed the #FoodRevolution Petition! Sign & watch AMAZING supporter's vid  
YEAH!! bit.ly/e3n2Ro SIGN THIS NOW and watch amazing supporters video w/Jen Aniston, Elton John, Robert Downey Jnr 
 SIGN THIS NOW and watch amazing supporters video w/Jen Aniston, Elton John, Robert Downey Jnr 
BOOM!!! #OYW Let's do this !!! watch live bit.ly/qpGZfW #FoodRevoution 
love it mate, hope u are good! 
THANKS RT "I just signed the #FoodRevolution Petition! Sign & watch AMAZING supporter's vid  
42minutes to go....watch live here  #OYW 
getting really excited!!!!! cant wait guys. #OYW  
THanks I need it! jxx  RT good luck! X 
THANKS FOR SIGNING  Ef Just signed up for #FoodRevoution Go Jamie 
THANKS FOR SIGNING  Ef Just signed up for #FoodRevoution Go Jamie 
Getting ready for #oyw today. Such an amazing opening ceremony. Watch live via details. Wish me luck!!! Jxx 
Thanks all for signing. You ARE making a difference! #FoodRevolution  
Here u go guys, exclusive new video  you WON'T believe who's on it!! AMAZING! RT RT RT 
hay i wanna meet you guys lets hook up after jamie xx 
Me and Bob Geldof at one young world summit 170 country's represented by 16 to 25 year olds s Zurich switzland  
YES BRO RT I've just added my name to the #FoodRevolution, watch EXCLUSIVE video & help (cont)  
THANKS DARLIN RT just signed 's #FoodRevolution global petition!! 
THANKS DARLING U ROCK RT I've just added my name to the #FoodRevolution, watch EXCLUSIVE video & hel… (cont)  
Thanks x “@howsitgoingtobe:curb childhood obesity: just signed petition for 's #FoodRevolution  
nice one bro“@theionajane: I've just added my name to the #FoodRevolution, watch EXCLUSIVE video  
YEAH! “@H_A_Moore: I've just added my name to the #FoodRevolution, watch EXCLUSIVE video  
#OYW - for the jump on tomorrow's speech SIGN PETITION  
If you dont have Facebook (firstly wow!) here's the celeb supporters video on the #FoodRevolution website  jxx 
Thanks for the RT RT RT SNEAK PEEK at the exclusive new supporters video  (cont)  
SNEAK PEEK at the exclusive new supporters video  U wont believe who is on it! ! Big love Jxx 
More pics from #OWY,   sooo amazing to be here with all these guys! 
So excited to be #OYW Can't wait for speech tomo!!   
LUV This RT "Leadership has 3 key elements: vision, action, relentlessness, authenticity"-Anth… (cont)  
i will try 
sure dalrin she can talk to 
want my #oyw countdown to speech widget for free?  scroll down to the bottom of page jxx 
are you ready for #oyw ?? 
YEAH !! RT TopMention(3hrs) 1:@OneYoungWorld 2:@dkny 3:@m4tt 4:@jamieoliver 5:@TNWmobile 
thanks mate. I owe you! “@NiBell: done! 
thanks for signing! “@sjstill: Just signed up. Love the work you're doing” 
see you #oyw 
tick tock tick tock....see you in 23 hours ..... 
No pressure!! “@davidjoneshavas: Thrilled to have at #OYW to talk on remarkable social
change on health, nutrition” 
The countdown has begun... 33 hours to go ....  
they are tough cookies 
Getting ready for on Friday....should I be worried..? 
yeah!!! “@FoodRevTeam: Hope you are all gearing up for the #FoodRevPARTY tonight with 7pm PDT/10pm EDT!! #FoodRevolution” 
yes say i said thats cool 
LUV U LOT!! RT Will you be joining the #FoodRevParty tonight?! Join the fun at 7pm PDT/10pm EDT! #FoodRevolution 
to my argentinian brothers and sisters, what's a good side dish to have with chimi churri beef? JO xxx 
#RecipeOfTheDay simple chargrilled marinated vegetables  enjoy jxx 
loooks lovely darlin 
the lovely is on here now too  
Excited to see TED Prize winner JR's INSIDE OUT project come to London! Starting in Peckham. Get involved guys!  
thank you , looks great 
cheers mate jo 
hi guys just put a load of new summer recipes up ,have a look.... big love jamie oliver xxx  
yep but 25 years ago dont think that makes me original 
Jamie's photo  via 
have a great bank holiday uk followers ...fingers crossed for sun !!.........remember that ? that warm thing that makes you feel good joxxxx 
mate i just dont understand why you would be fed badly when your ill its the one place where its vital , one day one day jox 
good lad 
bless you its a good one i love it joxx 
month ago in clapham at my feastival 
Packing up the 9/11 memorial tiles across from St. Vincent&#0... on Twitpic:  via 
cool should be fun hope your well jox 
haha none of the above bro a humble roast tonight 
the fire is alight, bless the english summer!! 4 seasons in one day!!
 love going out to my usa followers with hurricane be safe joxx 
say i offerd a glass of prosecco to u show them the tweet !! 
dont really want v's on my menu but i will be printing an individual v menu , there are 6 pastas that are or can be vegi jo 
it aint done for sure you need to navigate around the crap bro thats the trick you can get crap anywhere next time just ask 
looks great well done 
great so pleased you had a good time 
get a weekend job in a good restaurant and youll be sorted by 16 jo x x 
bless you so nice to here after the riots bless you we do try jox x x 
thanks xxxx 
bless you freudy!! hope your well.. been a while babe much love to you and all the family.....night honey jox 
Australian mates help i need a REALLY good Sydney based graffiti artists for a job can you help please send web links if poss etcxx jamie 
Lovely fresh salmon fish cakes & turns 40!!!  #FoodRevolution #HappyBirthday 
Lovin what my girl Amy is doing! jx RT Amy’s Food Revolution | Jamie Oliver (US)  via 
YEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEHAAAAAAAAAAA #RecipeOfTheDay blackened bbq pork fillets!!!!!  SO GOOD! jx 
whats on the specials today then my fantastic gang??? jxx 
you shud put up photos from the new islington restaurant! People really want to see it jxx 
lovin your work mrs q. You are great “@fedupwithlunch: It was great!” 
yes “@fedupwithlunch: Last night I made 's Broiled Fish with Mustard and Oats -- terrific! (From the Food Revolution cookbook)” 
thank u we try hard 
beer loopy 
we've just got the last few £5 charity cookbooks!  ENJOY! jxxx 
I just donated! U should too RT check out what we're doing for charity: water's 5 year anniversary:  
YES BRO RT and we're live. check out what we're doing for charity: water's 5 year anniversary:  
WATCH THIS ITS V IMPORTANT RT RT lots of excitement today. #september2011 campa… (cont)  
well done mate. Two girls!! You'll be following me soon with two more kids...welcome to sleepless nites again 
tough gig mate, but someone's got to do it ay!!! 
hello mate! much love from London jxx 
this dude is amazingRT This Wine Goes Well With Fish  
LOVE IT!!! WELL DONE DC RT #foodrevolution is hitting DC!  
what are u cooking then? 
thanks mate 
YEAH!!! glad u like it RT 's new restaurant in Islington is lovely! So atmospheric and cooool. 
hello mate, plans are getting worked on now...you watch this space. either way we'll def need your help!! 
Just seen your new trailer for #Colombiana ....Blimey darlin....how much training did u do for that?? #AskZoe 
YEAH!! CONGRATS! RT Baby jemimha has been born at Chelsea hospital at 3 45pm she weighs … (cont)  
getting the kids involved...  #FoodRevolution !!!!!!!!!! 
glad you liked the show ;ast night guys. recipes online. limited edition cookery book here  just £5 for charity!! 
yep, you heard! 
Thanks for all the lovely comments. Glad u liked show. Recipes are here jxx  
U should try Levi Roots chicken  RT Gonna chillout with some good scoff tonig… (cont)  
limited edition books for £5 and all profits for charity!!!  last chance to get them jxx 
Thanks you lovely lot jxx RT Don't miss Jamie Cooks Summer 9pm C4 - we can't wait! 
Done RT Want to Tweet with a real queen? Follow my friend (Also, be sure to wish her a happy birthday tomorrow!) 
ME too darlin  RT Looking forward to #jamiecookssummer tonight C4 9pm :-) 
not sure i can help with that babe 
LAst chance to get my Cookery book for £5  before tonites show 9pm on C4 - all for charity u lot jxx 
YEAH!!! RT looking forward to a bit of tonight. Is he a guilty pleasure? or just a pleasure? #jamiecookssummer 
thanks bro i love the place and the beef rocks 
let me know the problem gary and ill sort cheers j 
no mate there may be a little more protein in the bread flour but no much id treat them the same 
click the link mate,  “@Saulty88: were can I get the book for a fiver?” 
well done  “@FutureGillian: Woo hoo! This time bagged 1 before they'd sold out!” 
Sneak peek at Monday's show...Shh!!  the book is just £5 GET them while they last! 
morning to you too 
Me too!! Such a lovely show! Can't wait for you to see it!! “@DaintyDisco: I'm so excited for new show on Monday!" 
its all about the hands thats what its all about just tell him to wash them first 
have a great night 
on it cheers jox 
agreed ill follow up sorry jox 
may be a glass of something its already bargin what do you want a discount for 
yes hes great nice man and done it all 
what restaurant were u in ? 
gennaro you are the best 
agree 
99% of truffle oil isnt real its ok used very very subtly im not a massive fan we make our own truffle butter which is better 
have a good one bro 
shame what went wrong ?better luck next time 
Me and the cheatles luv it  
Emma- the most inspiring and lovely lady  
more from  
GET READY! RT And we're off.... Kim gets us started, welcoming all the wonderful people who ha… (cont)  
got my secret squirrel takin photos of gang as the auditorium fills up  
you have to dress up im me dress up 
here you go guys some tasty BBQ recipes its gonna be a good weekend !! love jamie o 
 
correct 
who cares 
6 only 
morning loverly people im in sunny brighton today, gonna do some prize giving with 1000 jamie at home girls ....wooop woop should be fun jox 
thats fantastic i love it roll on food revolution 
the original is pound garlic to mush slowly add oil to bulk season with oil salt pepper lemon juice 
so good mate“@Coplumbo was amazing Steak tartare incredible plus rump steak & whisky Plus this view  
GRAZIE MILLIE JOXX 
HOW GOOD IS THAT BEEF GUYS JO 
LOADS of recipes on www.jamieoliver.com mate im sure mac and cheese on there too 
amazing lunch with greatest minds in nutrition.Such fantastic people & discussions.So humbling...we've got a lot of work people! 
I just found out Barbecoa has one of the very largest whisky cellars in london , wood grilled air dried beef and good whisky rocks !! 
hi mate we have glasses of nice wines starting at 450 and bottle going from 15 to 1000's so lots of choice 
Happy 3rd birthday to Rotherham, I am really proud, 7,500 people through the doors a massive achievement. Have a great day! Jx 
how's the Islington restaurant gang?? cant wait to meet them. New place. SHAMOONN 
opening up in Islington soon.....cant wait 
cool thanks for the feed back guys some great points said there , recipes to follow big love jamie o 
wow a man after my own hard good man 
cool i just came up with a super cool happy cow burger recipe will follow 
whats that sounds cool 
but could you not say that about anything coucous rice oats pasta they all have subtle taste unless you work with it 
yes but not a carb a seed and very good for you 
Quinoa is being rated as an amazing super food! ive been test cooking it with some great results- what do you guys think? do u guys like it? 
wot in the pie.../?RT Put champagne in it 
luv the fajitas 
err uber chickens...?? RT I want to make an uber chicken pie, something a little different... Any advice? 
#recipeoftheday loverrrly summer tomato and horseradish salad  enjoy Jx #fb 
BOOOOO RT Yes, unhealthy school lunches are back! RT was that it then?? summer over?? 
was that it then?? summer over?? 
cool its amazing !! 
love NZ miss you guys jamie ox 
ok kiff bra following you, but don't use the Gordon line again otherwise you'll get it fitness boy ....ill popp in one day 
look nice bro get a nice rustic board bro 
cant remember if i went its all a blur !! but Birmingham ok now all good and i will check toms hope your well big kiss jumx x 
hi josh keep cooking with mummy bless you jamie o 
looking at your tweets today so many of you seem to be so happy and having fun with my recipes, that genuinely makes me very happy, blessed 
xxx 
enjoy moira you seem to be there alot these days great shopping, go2west hollywood farmers market on sundayam 
salsa verde is good , chimi churi sorry cant spell it , a mustard and balsamic dressing go for it 
good man simon respect easy on the chilli bro!!! no go for it 
Nice1 Andrew hope your well, looking forward to the new album 'Addictive' top man, loved your work for years!! bro jamieo 
fueling the #FoodRevolution 2 bring Food With Integrity to kids in L.A. Click 4 deets 2 text $  
u are tellin me! RT jamies Italian just opened in Islington...this is going to be dangerous! Yumm 
write to and they will sort ou mate 
oh yeah!!!!!!!!!!!! RT looking forward to jamboree!!!!!!!! not long now 
LUV THEM RT Check out our #FoodRevolution Blogs of the Month  Great for inspiration! 
Culinary Glastonbury!! sounds big RT In the observer 2day, read my motivation 4 R MAD Sympos… (cont)  
ooow moody 
its u need to RT mate for the V tickets, not me! good luck hope u win em 
Thanks mate RT jamies Italian, best restaurant in Nottingham! 
Looks like peopl want the free V tickets RT Wow. We've got some lovely followers doing some great thi… (cont)  
LUV these guys and free V tickets!! RT Last chance: To win a pair of V Fest (Staffs) tickets RT an… (cont)  
top work RT just having lunch in Jamie's Italian Brighton. Cris… (cont)  
what a loverly day! is it shandy weather tho today?? 
ABSOLUTELY LOVE THIS!!! RT Message on shop in Clapham #ukriots  
as soon as the cold comes they will probably come back and catch up or just catch them or net them 
gud sunday food RT club sandwich from the iPad app Magistraat  
damb good you shouldn't really taste it it should be more of a savoury incredibleness just use a little its very authentic 
nothing is impossible 
wooooooo 
its been a while but the last time it tasted pretty good .......at least you know where it all comes from these days 
nice dont over load that bad boy 
woolworths closed down last year babe 
classic gerkins or no gerkins 
bye bye 
what are you 1,434,704 of you cooking tonight? 
flatend lamb chops for dinner just made a joyful 10 chilli! kinda piripiri sauce with smoked ancho chillis and my first crops of home grown 
may be wrong ingredients? its been tested a million times have a second go p.s Szechwan pepper does make your lips tingle 
.tap restore on his iPhone 4 (More > Settings > Restore Purchases) and they will sync.
Or he can e-mail support@zolmo.com 
sorry they promised me they would..ill send you the mail they sent me jo 
yes 
ah thanx RT I love Jamie magazine. It's a beautiful magazine and to hav… (cont)  
butter????? RT Attention !! : RT BUTTER COW! #100YearsofButteryExcellence  
oow i feel priveleged RT Yay 4 #FollowFriday (cont)  
sexy SIZZLIN fajitas  for my #FoodRevolution gang #ff !!! jxx 
of course jRT hey Jamie. Loved the food revolution watched every episode here in New Zealand. Follow me? :) 
youre in cornwall too darlin?? love the english coast, stay warm jxx 
u are so right mate, and im followin u both !! RT rather than myself, I'm going to suggest #ff 
hello darlin im followin u RT Follow me! x 
followed both mate #ff RT #ff britain best unsigned band give us some help as a fellow drummer 
alrite yep done for both of you #ff RT me and my lovely friend 
that is a very nice plan yes lets RT your favourite charities #followfriday #ff 
ok done mate, followin u RT I'll ff you, if you ff me??? 
wow thanks dude for supporting! 
the ideas are for who I should #followfriday ?? I need suggestions #ff 
#recipeoftheday lovely pasta, let's hope it's a summery weekend for summertime tagliarini  enjoy! Jx #fb 
Give me some #FF ideas people I need help jx 
which one my friend? 
great!! 
happy anniversary 
great news RT Excellent lunch Jamie's Kingston today. Team doing a great job. X 
happy birthday mate 
yeh thats a good one! 
they are tellin me - (More > Settings > Restore Purchases) and they will sync. Or e-mail support@… (cont)  
helo mate so u need to tap restore on your iphone 
helo you lovelry lot 
oooow Matt's here!, everyone say hello to matt and folow him pls jxx 
should be cool bro let me check it out 
its sooooooooo good 
bless you they are a great bunch 
respect to you all jox 
not true can't have done that bad as most are in jobs or back in education doing well it was an experiment not perfect!!u try 
i dont at all great city i mean that 
jan feb when we open restaurant in briz_vagus ! very exciting and no pic ban all the best jo 
would love to meet you one day would be so exciting to meet face to face 
love nz special place and no riots 
my point is if they want to ban pics they cant its impossible and you'll see thats the point of social media it is what it is 
lack of family unit & positive role models / schooling = a %of youth that have no sense of right or wrong, feral kids very sad 
now im haning wondering what the.... you were talking about?...thing about ausi food is its cool & quality in food& experience 
yay well done congrats 
xx 
here herer good luck 
have you did u will u 
dude that sentence makes no sense what booze have you been on try again jox 
most cool places have better things 2 worry about like service & food, the posh restaurants will probably succeed love 2 ausi 
at the end of the day restaurants are far more concerned about customers spending $ than winging about photos 
phone's in many environments can be very annoying saying that if people want a pic they will get it its impossible to police 
wow your very poetic bro 
good lad 
strange tweet mike love to meet you one day i really would 
brum rocks love it and the diversity of people, this is about a bunch of idiots taking liberties im proud to be there 100% 
good man 
here here i agree i feel there might be a big lack of parents around for these guys just a gut feeling no role models 
bro ive personally seem more white kids on TV rioting, mind u mr king would be good to have around he knew his stuff what a man 
i hear you we may need some tax breaks for victims of this i agree 
we got to meet some time you should do somthing for my magazine whats your best dish 
im gonna retweet that 
good man 
oouuch! 
you got it bro 
Birmingham restaurant got fixed up quick, sad for many of the other shop owners especially the small family run businesses in this climatex 
what a day .....respect to all the community support on the clean up people have ben amazing!! wasn't really sure what recipes 2 post today 
yep we got on it asap i herd its kicking off there again fingers crossed for everyone 
bless u im so sorry good luck bro 
Right outside RT recognise the pink paint! “@Riotcleanup: At johns roa… (cont)  
amazing in Clapham applaudin the police,  WELL DONE GUYS 
God bless the communities getting together to sort this out #RiotCleanUp People who care about their country!! 
luv them RT Your managers from all areas were doing round robins to check peopl… (cont)  
enough tweeting thank u all 4 support!xx thanks to the police & emergency services for what there dealing with the communities are amazing! 
bless you your right.....theres a fine line between foraging and looting 
THANKS mate im gonna come home early to check out thanks 
my cookery school was in the thick of clapham riot but seems there not interested in reading or cooking as Waterstones & Resipease go left 
theres a few free in every airport and military base jo back to holiday 
thats not the point Ian,business insurance its statutory & big or small its hard each restaurant has 120 staff with bills to pay 
sadly my restaurant in Birmingham got smashed up windows all gone whole area closed, cant open, staff and customers all safe!!thankfully jox 
no simon 
my love and thoughts go out to everyone effected by these riots,and all the people i work with who are in the thick of it ...be safe ....... 
agree 
so sad to see whats happening in UK with these Riots!all gone mad !time to get our country back now we need 2 come down hard on these idiots 
riots 
good luck all the best 
may be we should all just talk about a few hundred idiot all day then 
you should write a book 
because its tacky i don't like it babe bring some polo's ill leave that to the others 
not just london 
thats the spirit thank you very much joxxx 
smash the all the anti pasti options share a mixture starter size pasta's the ravioli are amazing thats what i do jox 
check it on you tube tomorrow jox 
ok u loverly lot as you've been asking what time the show is its 9pm ch4 & sign the petition along with 710.000 people  
just have a look at the show hugh's done a great job you might learn something don't be ignorant and stop following me then ! 
hi guys anyone in the UK please tune into"hugh's fish fight"on ch4 tonight its a really important programme & everyone must get involved jox 
V excited too!! RT .@jamieoliver Hello Jamie! We're very excited to host tomorrow nights #Food… (cont)  
all over it mate j 
YEAH!!! #PhinneasAndFerb RT watching Phineas and Fern with the kids and is on the cartoon. LOVE IT! 
haha!! Bless em, don't think the wife would agree!! Jxxx 
on holiday with the family darlin, and luving it!! jx RT loads.... How about you? 
not shamefull?!?!?!? weirdo if its free i could have plugged my book and my own app , whats the matter with you 
good luck get well soon have a look on jamieoliver.com theres loadsa free inspiration 
hay guys if you would like a great photo app download instagram for free!! and follow me.... its really great i love it  
do what i wrote read the introduction and yes it always works if you follow it to the T JOXX 
im sorry mate talk to and they will sort u 
a glass of red...where are u? i hope not london 
check out tonight people  BIG BIG NEWS! 
cheese on toast....yes 
happy birthday then mate 
whats goin on today then people?? 
did you have fun darlin? #FoodRevolution 
you never know Mate 
I know I know but I'm really chuffed so I can't help it p.s it's free for the starter pack so ther In the buff  
Luv the usa gang!!! Dinner to Benefit Jamie Oliver's Food Revolution for $85 -  
nice one! RT@AppStore Jamie's Recipes is the #iPhone and #iPad App of the Week. #appstore  
#recipeoftheday good ol toad in the hole  nice one Jx #fb 
Luv the usa gang!!! Dinner to Benefit Jamie Oliver's Food Revolution for $85 -  
#FoodRevolution launches LA text-in campaign 4 better school food w Chipotle & 100 top chefs/restaurants!  Amazing joxx 
#recipeoftheday fresh asian noodle salad, perfect for this summer's day  Jx #fb 
congrats matey good luck jox 
nice 1! RT@JamiesItalianUK Here's a #BigShoutOut from our #fantastic team in #Cheltenham excited on their first week  
#recipeoftheday lovely crostini - pea and broad bean purée with pecorino  enjoy! Jx #fb 
hiya mate 
i bet he doesnt have my new book!! £5  & ALL proceeds go to charity!! jxx 
TODAY - more recipe development and more photos. what about u loverly lot? 
if your a vegetarian yes i agree if not free range british pork is fantastic with home grown veg 
sorry about that, its highly unusual for us i hope you made you point to the manager and got looked after give them another go jo 
happy birthday boys lots of luck and love jamie ox x x 
heres link again to my new book for just £5  from & ALL proceeds go to charity!! jxx 
yep it is mate, there will be another next year 
thanks babe jxx 
yes brutha RT just ordered book. Please RT and follow if poss. Cheers 
so get my new book for just £5 here  from and ALL proceeds go to charity!! jxx 
ANd then there were none!!!!!! WELL DONE !!!!  such amazing news jxx 
I've found my place!!! Time for a street party!! Islington  
more £5 books are coming guys so I'll tweet it out when they are there 
who missed ? well get your hands on the my NEW cookbook for only £5  and its for charridee! 
ello mate RT hello from San Francisco #foodrevolution 
NICE RT Knoxville, TN checking in. Started using a CSA this year and joined the #foodrevolution 
well hello thailand too then! RT Hello from Thailand, Jamie. <3 
HEELO AUSTRALIA CREW 
luv the tazzys 
hello 
ok, done. youve been followed! RT Can You Please Follow Me?! 
im shooting some recipes today so mayb one of them RT what are you having for lunch? Xx 
love you too babe RT love you 
thank you too 
HELLO GERMANY!!!!!!! RT Hello from Germany! 
ooooow saucy RT Hello Gorgeous! 
talk to me gang 
ive never told anyone what to eat, facilitating better choices is important 
i dont know mayor bloomburg is very impressive id be amazed if cash didn't go direct to help others 
my english spelling is bad enough hope it wasnt to bad 
Norske naboer, står Britain av deg i disse harde tider, jeg sender kjærlighet, støtte og styrke, velsign dem familiens kjærlighet Jamie Oxxx 
sorry about that it can happen not often but ill double check in the am cheers 
Such a terrible shame to loose Amy winehouse such a talent, such a waste, raw talent. Centeral essex  
I tunes festival is brilliant cold play Camden round house  
Cold play round house amazing Camden round house  
Oh dear not the brassys RT not summer in oz mate. 1 deg this morn #brassmonkeytime 
NO WASY RT Too hot. 
well done, get out there and get it done 
wow, tough morning ay 
haha i had a bowl cut when i was a kid too 
would love to 
so what's going on with everyone then? loving the weather today...maybe its summer ay?! 
helo darlin 
GREAT! RT Just over 1yr to go b4 2012 olympics.Time 2 get behind our potential olympians … (cont)  
#recipeoftheday lovely summer chickpea salad, well it is summer after all so enjoy!  Jx #fb 
thanks for your amazing support! #FoodRevolution 
#recipeoftheday lovely warm grilled peach and frisee salad with goat's cheese dressing is on the menu today  Jx #fb 
Nice one! Jx RT@JamiesItalianUK Complimentary glass of prosecco anyone... jamiesitalian.com/twitter 
haha. That made me laugh 
fearne is a great cook! 
were they my recipe, ahhh nice one. You like a scone dont u ! Jxx 
talk to !! 
Lookin good mate!! “@CHRISDJMOYLES: Scones...!!!Right, whilst I was making these, what have I missed..?!  
ay? Just changed mate 
my mate Mike Matthew's film UNHAPPY BIRTHDAY screens Sat 23rd July, presented by and part of #POUT3 so cool x 
u like her dont u RT Amazing! nominated for Mercury prize!!!! you absolute star!!!!!!! you deserve it gurrrrl! 
yeah thats a good one glad u liked it 
u say that a lot 
YEAHHHH!!! HELLO jxxxx RT our first day on twitter - hello to all 
#recipeoftheday lovely wild strawberries and vanilla cream  enjoy Jx #fb 
dont thank me, u were great mate RT We had such a good time at Thanks for having us! 
